Authors
Max Hoffmann
Number of Reviews
36

Title
Review for Zero Patience (1993)
1993 CANADA
Writer/Director: John Greyson
Composer: Glenn Schellenberg
Lyrics: John Greyson
Cast: John Robinson, Normand Fauteux, Dianne Heatherington,
      Ricardo Keens-Douglas, Michael Callen, Marla Lukofsy
Producers: Louise Garfield, Anna Stratton
Cinematography: Susan McKenzie
     A must see!  Canadian film maker John Greyson has pulled off the
nearly unthinkable: an uncompromising, in-your-face, Queer/Aids
*musical* that is highly entertaining, and is destined to be a cult
classic.  The film makes no apologies for its randy sexuality, and will
offend more conservative viewers.  But it's refreshing to see a
"message" film that, unlike PHILDADELPHIA, wasn't neutered to please
the Blockbuster crowd.
     Borrowing from a variety of cultural icons, on the surface the
film might be initially mistaken for a fluffy piece of entertainment.
But deft direction, inspired casting, punky rhythms with scathing
lyrics and healthy doses of frontal male nudity save the film from
taking on the didactic overtones of most "message" films.
     The whimsical script has Victorian sexologist and explorer, Sir
Richard Francis Burton (John Robinson), still miraculously alive after
over 170 years (due to an unfortunate encounter with the fountain of
youth).  Burton has resurfaced in the Natural History Museum, where
he's working on his upcoming exhibit, "The Hall of Contagion."  When
his most coveted exhibit becomes unavailable, he hits on the inspired
idea of making "Patient Zero" (the enticing Normand Fauteux, as the
maligned French-Canadian flight attendant, accused of bringing AIDS to
North America) in to the centerpiece of the show.  Like the tales of
Scheherazade, the telling of Zero's tale keeps him "alive," as a lusty
ghost that only Burton can see, and eventually touch.
     The film is peppered with imaginative musical segments that run
the gamut from synchronized swimming, to Buzby Berkeley camera angles
on Michael Callen (in drag as "Miss HIV").  Callen fulfilled a lifelong
dream by holding a note longer (19 seconds) than Barbra Streisand did
in any of her films!
     Though it's easy to rave about the film's more innovative visual
aspects, the glue that holds the film together is the corral of strong
performers that Greyson pulled forth from the highly fecund Canadian
performing arts scene.  The highly watchable Normand Fauteux brings
just the right impish charm to his Zero, who still wants to get laid
after years beyond the Grave.  Even still photographic images of
Fauteux holds the audience's attention like fly paper.  Also notable is
the memorable screen presence of Dianne Heatherington, as an ACT UP
leader who takes no prisoners.  Marla Lukofsky nearly steels the film
when she sings "Contagious," as the African Green Monkey.
     Video and film artist John Greyson's previous work includes "The
ADS Epidemic" ("Acquired Dread of Sex'--1987), and "The Making of
Monsters" (1991).  "Because I come from experimental film and video,
but want to reach broader audiences," Greyson relates, "the musical
seemed to be a perfect strategy.  In a perverse way, I loved adopting
such a traditionally 'fluffy' genre, and applying it to the politics of
such a controversial and depressing subject."
     Composer Glenn Schellenberg echoes Greyson's sentiments: "With
Zero, we were interested in creating a musical space where lots of
popular references would quote a whole smorgasbord of styles."  Not
wanting to privilege one style of music, Schellenberg relates that "our
references were everything from Pet Shop Boys and the Jesus and Mary
Chain to Ricky Ricardo and the Pirates of Penzance."  Calypso meets
barber shop.  Hi-NRG meets Broadway.  Gershwin meets Morrissey.
     Greyson and Schellenberg's songs richly deserve a soundtrack.  Not
every number is memorable, but several songs, particularly "Six or
Seven Things," "Zero Patience," and "Positive" stand out.  In
"Positive," school teacher George, who's losing his eyesight from AIDS
medication, sings the sentiments known to all too many:
        They're positive that I'm positive
        They're sure that these doubts are a curse
        I'm supposed to be certainly certain
        Well, I'm sure that I'm getting worse
        I'm positive I'm here, I'm positive I care
        I'm positive that there's nothing to be sure of
        I'm positive I'm positive, I'm positive I'm still alive
        I'm positive that I'm going to die...
        sometime.
     The randy, male sexuality that's in your face through out the film
will stretch the envelope for some mainstream viewers virtually to the
breaking point.  Yet, somehow, Greyson has managed to inform and
entertain, while breathing new life into the musical format.  Far from
being a comedy (there are searingly personal moments of the pain that
comes from living with the disease), it is a film you will not soon
forget.

Title
Review for When Night Is Falling (1995)
     Although it won the Best Screenplay Award at the Los Angeles Gay
and Lesbian Film Festival, WHEN NIGHT IS FALLING ultimately proves that
a woman (in this case writer/director  Patricia Rozema) can make a film
as badly as any man.  The film is *so* bad, in fact that its high camp
watermark might make it a candidate for the next BAD MOVIES WE LOVE
book.  Rozema makes quite a departure from her earlier, brilliant I'VE
HEARD THE MERMAIDS SINGING, and turns in a tepid, softcore epic worthy
of Zalman King (RED SHOES DIARY).
     While the Canadian location is never specified, we suspect it's a
few miles from LAKE CONSEQUENCE, due to truck-sized plot holes and
missing character bone structure.  Rozema has taken a paint-by-numbers
approach to lesbian romantic adventure: take two disparate, but exotic
women from different worlds (in this case, the Circus and a seminary),
give one of them a beautiful but boorish man to choose from, and have a
crises to make one of them emotionally vulnerable.  Also have one of
the women be incredibly brazen in her pursuit of the indecisive
beginner.  Preferably, make the romance interracial or cross-cultural
(Rozema does both).
     In this case we have Camilla (Pascal Bussires), a stone-faced
Isabelle Hubert wanna-be who teaches mythology in a strict Protestant
seminary.  She's emotionally distraught from hiding her passionate
affair with fellow faculty member, Martin (a throw-away performance by
Henry Czerny, the evil woofcake of BOYS OF ST. VINCENT).  We know that
she's really torn over the conflict between her religious convictions
and pre-wedlock sex, because she's sends him to work with a sloppy kiss
on the doorstep, wearing only his pajama tops!  (Focus, Camilla,
focus!)
     Camilla's emotional vulnerability is heightened by her dog, who
mysteriously bounds out of her office and dies in an alley-way, with no
evident sign of injury.  The distraught Camilla installs the pooch in
her Frigidaire, then heads to the laundromat for relief.  A chance
encounter there with the exotic Petra (Rachel Crawford) leads Camilla
into new territory.  Petra is a circus acrobat!  Knowing a good thing
when she sees it, Petra pulls a switcheroo on the laundry so Camilla
will have to track her down at the weird warehouse Circus where she
performs exotic dances.
     Camilla's first glimpse of Petra in her "other world" of the
circus is when Petra steps out of a silhouette against a drumskin to
reveal shes done up in a skin-tight leather jump suit, with pilot
goggles like Rocky the flying squirrel.  (Who could possibly resist
that?)  Petra also has one of the best lesbian pick-up lines of all
time, "Camilla!  I like that name, it sounds like "Come here.'"
     Zalman King dished up a Chinese steambath for Joan Severance and
Billy Zane to do the nasty in at LAKE CONSEQUENCE.  Rozema creates a
never-never circus world with disco lights on the ceiling, and interior
decorating in Petra's trailer that would make Andy Warhol swoon!  (Just
how much they pay you to perform in a Canadian circus).
     Over-the-top background characters are used to make Camilla's and
Petra's lack of motivation more believable.  The circus is run by kooky
but lovable Tim (Don McKeller with an accent he picked up somewhere
between Transylvania and Detroit) and streetwise Tory (Tracy Wright).
In one of their many altercations, Tory is accusing Tim of being
incompetent.  "Oh, yeah," shoots back Tim, "what about that raccoon act
you did!" Tory pauses and sighs, "How could I know they'd be so
selfish!"  Sure, it doesn't make sense, but neither do any of the major
plot points.
     Softcore flicks with woman-on-woman action aimed at straights
usually have a musical key to alert viewers that something is about to
happen.  In NIGHT IS FALLING, an irritating cello solo begins sawing
away whenever these gals are ready to shed their clothes and have at
it.  The love scenes are interspersed with a pseudo Cirque d'Soleil
trapeze act between two women to symbolize the dangerous balance they're
in.  (The speechless high-wire artists prove much more interesting than
the two main characters).
     The rest of the plot doesn't much matter, as it offers few
surprises.  Lighting, pace and tone for each scenes comes straight from
Zalman King.  Rozema pays a nod to PRISCILLA, QUEEN OF THE DESERT with
a ludicrous surprise as the credits roll.  (Remember the Judy Doll/kite
landing in the Japanese monastery?)  Camilla has buried her beloved dog
in a pile of soap flakes (uh, snow!) before trying to do herself in.
After being revived by her beloved, Camilla head towards the
international Circus Festival in San Francisco with Petra.  We see a
paw emerge from the snow ... and voila!  The pooch bounds, resurrected,
across the snowy landscape, (in slow motion of course).  It's an
appropriate ending for a film that is a dog, in every sense of the
word.  We can only assume that like River Phoenix in MY OWN PRIVATE
IDAHO, the dog was a victim of narcolepsy.  Or maybe he tried to make
it through the script.
     Viewers wanting answers to missing character motivation and more
can meet Screenwriter/Director Patricia Rozema when her film screens at
the Mill Valley Festival on Saturday, October 14 at 10 PM, in the
Sequoia II theater in Mill Valley.  Contact BASS for ticket info.

Title
Review for Gorilla Bathes at Noon (1993)
Seen: Sun 5/10/93, Palo Alto Square, SF Film Festival
Rating: 6 (scale of 1->10)
Germany 1993, 83 min.
In English, Russian and German with English subtitles
Director/Screenplay: Dusan Makavejev
Prod:  Alfred Hurmer, Boana Marijan, Joachim von Vietinghoff
Camera: Aleksander Petkovic, Miodrag Milosevic
Editor: Vuksan Lukovac
CAST: Svelozar Cvetkovic, Anita Mancic, Alexandra Rohmig, Petar Bozovic
IN A NUTSHELL: a great, original premise for a film that misses the
mark; a major in the Red Army decide to stay behind in Berlin and "make
it," after reunification.  In spite of the clever interspersing with a
campy post-war Russian "victory over Berlin" film, this movie sags as
the hero begins to wear on you, and the sight gags lose their
freshness.  Would lose most mainstream audiences, but the art-house
crowd may find enough gems in this dust heap to make it worth viewing.
     Major Victor Borisovich's soviet officer's unit has "deserted"
him, leaving him behind in a city still trying to rebuild itself.  The
naive hero (played by Yugoslav stage actor, Svetozar Cvetkovic) takes
the wrong tack, bicycling around the city in full uniform with the Red
Flag on his bicycle (because he's used to women "falling" for his
uniform).  Though initially an engaging hero, the material gradually
wears thin, and the Major starts to resemble an obnoxious Danny Kaye.
     His journey through Berlin is hardly boring.  He falls in with an
aspiring artist, and eventually beds her, only to receive retribution
from her Turkish lover (whose charcoal etched good looks makes the
wispy Russian's conquest a little unbelievable).  The film hits its low
point as the Major ends up with an Oliver Twist-like group of outcasts,
living in an abandoned building.  The motley crew resembles a colorful
group of hastely assembled stereotypes chosen to be foils to the
Major's off-beat ways.  The script even throws in a baby for the "heart
warming" effect.  In this tepid soup, it's more like indigestion.
     The unifying symbol in this film is the eventual decapitation and
tear down of a huge statue of Lenin.  The director revealed in the
post-viewing Q/A that a few kegs of beer for the wrecking crew bought
him the privilege of shooting the action, with he and the actor high on
the scaffolding, while the press was cordoned off hundred of feet
away.  This may have been the film's only triumph.
     Highlights of the film are the frequently interspersed clips from
THE FALL OF BERLIN (1949).  It's a high camp, Russian propaganda piece
with outrageously operatic deaths, and closeups smudgily superimposed
over what appears to be a color postcard of the burning Reichstag.
Unfortunately, this film begins to look more interesting than the
modern work that frame's it.  This has oft been a problem, for instance
in film biographies of old movie stars where the vintage Hollywood
clips are more interesting than the contemporary spin on the subject's
lives.
     The film has crisp photography, but it's not brilliant enough to
avoid the wait for this turkey to come out on video.  It might be
appropriately labeled a WINGS OF DESIRE with wings of lead.  Unlike
its German predecessor, this one never gets off the ground.

Title
Review for Tombeau d'Alexandre, Le (1992) (TV)
IN A NUTSHELL: a highly engrossing video about the career and struggles
of a cinematic Russian genius, little-known even to his own people.
Hypnotic archival clips make you yearn to see the original films in
their entirety.  Sheds much needed light on little known aspects of
life in the Soviet Union from Lenin through Stalin.  Transcends the
deadness of many "talking heads" interview.  The memories shared are
immediate and highly personal.
     The film/video is structured in the form of six "letters" to the
deceased Alexander Ivanovitch Medvedkin, which explore and expose his
career as a driving force behind the pioneering "film trains" of the
October Revolution.  Medvedkin is still being rediscovered, even in the
Soviet Union, because he was perennially censored by bureaucrats who
couldn't understand the brilliance of his craft.  Ironically, Medvedkin
was a "pure" communist, who always held to the vision of Lenin.  But as
time went on he found himself surrounded by communists who "faked"
being communists.  His survival into old age (89 years) is a miracle
and an inspiration for "silenced" artisitic visionaries worldwide.  The
survival of nine of his "never shown" films to our present day  is
nothing less than a miracle of Biblical proportions.
     To many Americans, the details of how these Soviet financed
projects were censored or shelved will seem uncomfortably "close to
home" in our era of Jesse Helms, the NEA and the Christian Right's
determination to cut out paper plate sized fig leaves for healthy
depictions of the human form.  Though the Soviets weren't driven by a
frozen religious ideology, their "Stalin knows best" approach to film
cutting is indistinguishable from our own Jesse Helms (currently
trying to protect us from lesbians in high office).  It's easy to see
why some of Medvedkin's films didn't cut committee approval (like one
epic where a group of comrades find themselves in Hell, after death in
battle, and make themselves comfortable because it's so much better
than what they've just been through in Soviet society!).  Some of his
humor was a bit like an early Russian Gary Larson.
     Images from the archival film footage are unforgettable.  Much is
shown from HAPPINESS, the only Medvedkin film well known outside
Russia (though made in 1934, it got its American premier at the 1972
San Francisco International Film Festival).  You will see images of a
peasant's house running away with legs and feet, a large hotel being
removed from a futuristic Moscow on wheels, a tribunal of cows judging
people.  Twilight year interviews with Medvedkin himself are interwoven
with fascinating insights from surviving contemporaries, (as well as
promising young Russian film makers influenced by him).
     Years before CNN's "see it now" coverage of the bombing of
Baghdad, Medvedkin invented the concept of the "film train."  It was a
working film studio with processing facilities transformed from box
cars!  Passenger cars on the train were remodeled into the theatre.
Medvedkin would travel around the country shortly after the revolution,
shoot propaganda oriented films with local residents, develop/edit the
film, and show it to them a few hours later!  (Models of the train are
available for viewing at London's Museum of the Moving Image.)
Wonderful demonstrations of his innovations include the "rifle camera"
he invented in WWII, so ordinary soldiers, trained in the infantry,
could aim through the "cross hairs" and get dramatic front line
coverage of history in the making.
     Medvedkin often had to "recreate" historic battles.  Ironically,
for Westerners, the most universally recognized image of the storming
of the Winter Palace is his highly romanticized recreation.  (One
contemporary relates that more extras were accidentally trampled to
death during the filming than the casualties of the original event,
which took place three years before!)
     Your heart will ache to see some of his films in their entirety,
especially one of his high camp color "musicals" made during WWII, that
features giddy peasant women singing their hearts out while they shovel
wheat!  Images from the Silent films, (which he made into the 30s)
resemble the eeriest of German cinema of the 20s, like THE GOLEM.
Fascinating background detail is also revealed on the actor who
frequently played Stalin's "cameos" in these films (whose image is
more recognizable to the West than the dictator himself).  Thoughts of
Ronald Reagan give some irony to this "actor in the Kremlin."
     Must viewing for any serious student of film, and high on
entertainment value for anyone else.  Probably destined for showing on
PBS.  Request it at your local, esoteric video outlet.
The original French title:
Le Dernier Bolchevik, ou Le Tombeau d'Alexandre
Print from: Les Films de l'Astrophore
(sorry, their address wasn't listed in the festival guide.  Try Paris
directory assistance.)

Title
Review for Orlando (1992)
Seen: Sat 5/9/93, SF's Castro Theatre, SF Film Festival
Rating: 13 (yes!) (on a scale of 1->10)
     A Gift!  A transforming Experience!  "If there's only one film you
see this year...."  A must see.  Waiting for this one to come on video
instead of viewing it in Kine's temple might be justifiable grounds
for the death penalty!
     Director Sally Potter received the SF's film festival's first
bestowing of Satyajit Ray Lifetime achievement award (named after the
great Bengali filmmaker).  Potter has taken what many thought to be an
unfilmable work of Virginia Woolf, and created what is destined to be an
enduring classic, illuminated with the radiant presence of Tilda
Swinton (EDWARD II, CARVAGGIO) in the lead.  The film stretches the
envelope that defines our arbitrary definitions of masculinity and
femininity.  A perfect union of sound and image, the film boasts an
amazing soundtrack.  Potter has also made an additional gift to the
film world with the inclusion of a compelling, though brief,
performance by Quentin Crisp; a fitting cap to his wonderfully
chequered career.
     General distribution in North America coming soon.  The film
caused a major stir at both the Venice and Toronto film festivals.
(Currently showing on screens in the UK.)
     In her brief Q/A session after the film and award ceremony (my
quotes drawn to best of memory), Potter said she was drawn to this
story of eternal youth and immortality "because of the twin plagues of
AIDS and nuclear annihilation that we live under.  After losing so many
friends to AIDS and seeing the staggering loss of their voices, this
film had to be made."  Potter also affirmed her conviction "to create
the same spiritual insights and transformations with cinema that
masters like Mozart created with music."  Upon viewing this film, you
will agree that she has achieved that goal.  Before seeing this film,
you might be tempted to label Potter as a great "woman" film director.
With this work, she has shed the triviality of gender.  She is one of
the world's greated film directors.  Period.
     Sally Potter has reaffirmed my hope that we need not always look
to the past for enduring cinema.  That films as great as the German
silents of the 20s, as great as the works of Orson Welles are still
being created.
     In the rest of the review I quote directly from B. Ruby Rich's
program notes:
     "...ORLANDO is based upon the Virginia Woolf volume of the same
name and tells the picaresque tale of a young man who lives through
four centuries in rather unusual circumstances.  He progresses at first
in keeping with his upper-class origins, taking immortality in stride,
until one day he wakes up, magically transformed into a woman.  And so
it goes: s/he continues on from the Victorian age to the present,
exploring along the way questions of courtliness and beastliness, war
and peace, politics and property, past and future -- and gender.
     "ORLANDO's narrative progression is, if anything, post-modern.
Lush operatic music surges on the soundtrack, the camera sweeps us off
our feet, wry intertitles march us through history, and the
incandescent Tilda Swinton (EDWARD II) marches us through genders in
her embodiment of Orlando through the ages.  No wonder audiences love
it.  Potter admits to being influenced by Soviet cinema (ORLANDO's
cameraman Alexei Rodionov is Russian) and by Michael Powell (the great
British director who championed her cause in the years before his
death) but certainly Satyajit Ray could shine in her firmament of
influences as well, for he would have recognized the beauty created
here and the valor of its execution."

Title
Review for Together Alone (1991)
     Although I loved this film when I recently saw it in Australia, my
initial reaction was that maybe it only spoke to gay men.  However, I
took two straight girl friends to see it this weekend, and they both
said "this is *my* life!"--so I'm recommending it to a wider audience.
     Amazingly, with only a $7,000 budget,  P. J. Castellaneta has
pulled together a credible and compelling B/W 35mm film about 2 guys
dialoguing "the morning after."  There's nothing to compare it to, but
one might be tempted to label it MY DINNER WITH ANDRE meets A MAN AND A
WOMAN ... with an all-male cast!
     It becomes clear within the first few minutes that (a) after a
one-night stand these two guys had sex and (b) they didn't use a condom.
The film transcends the expected "ABC Afterschool Special" heavy hitting
morality approach, and deals believably with trust, self-delusion, and
accepting the consequences of our choices.  In terms of addressing
issues of safe sex, and the "new/new" morality, the film effectively
deals with just about every self-deluding argument you might personally
encounter OR manufacture.
     Terry Curry, as the heart throb hunk who turns out to be a "Married
with Children" bisexual, will strike a chord with many a wronged
straight gal, and may cause a few straight guys to fidget in their seats
from unwelcomed self-recognition.  Todd Stites is fairly believable as
the more "out" and usually "responsible" gay man.  Unfortunately he
inherits the lion's share of dreary political pronouncements, though
there are some delicious quotes (e.g., "Believe you me, there was
many a press-on nail and high heel that was broken to preserve our
rights" and "I don't think a drowning man is equipped to save the
whales.")
     Through both actor's gifted performances and the deft direction,
the unexpected result is that the characters are ultimately identical to
just about any straight guy that you might know, from the workplace to
the gym.  (Unexpected, that is for an *American* film to achieve such an
amazing revelation.)  The film should be viewed in the same spirit as
SOUNDER, which broke ground back in the 70's portraying a Black family
with few of the then prevailing stereotypes.  If you go to see it,
overlook the fact that the background music will occasionally remind you
of one of those early Sunday morning shows put on by the Brothers of
St. Paul, and that in the opening scenes the director got a little
over-fascinated with the effect of headlights through the patterned
curtains on the slumbering duo.  All of the "action" takes place on a
checkered bed spread (obviously a chess board) and the actors appear to
be lit only by a gooseneck lamp, (but amazingly they are well lit enough
to allow every nuance of expression show through, even when shadows
create "racoon eyes.")  There are some elements that over stretch
credibility (like them both having the same dream--are they aspects
of the same person?)
     If this were a major studio effort, I'd give it a 7, but making
allowances for the fact that only 4 people were in involved, (2 actors,
1 director/writer/caterer and 1 cameraman) it warrants an 8.
     The film also breaks new ground in that, despite it's "adult"
theme, there is *no* nudity, (the heater's broken so they put on their
sweats) *no* sex, *no* violence and *scant* profanity.  You don't even
see these guys kiss on the lips!  The magic of story telling and seeing
off screen characters in your own mind's eye holds this film together...
something that hasn't been done for a long, long time.  In terms of
criteria for content rating towards an NC-17 this film could be
shown on the Disney channel.   (Don't hold your breath, though!)
     Currently at San Francisco's Castro through Thurs 1/7; expect it at
San Jose's Camera 3, and possibly the Varsity in Palo Alto.  If it comes
out on Video, it'll be tough to locate.  At best, it might show up on
three or four PBS stations next Gay Pride week in June before it goes
into oblivion.

Title
Review for Adventures of Priscilla, Queen of the Desert, The (1994)
THE ADVENTURES OF PRISCILLA, QUEEN OF THE DESERT 
-- Australian 1994, 107  min
Director & Screenplay: Stephan Elliot
Producer:  Al Clark, Michael Hamlyn
Camera: Brian Breheny
Editor: Sue Blainey
Cast: Terence Stamp, Hugo Weaving, Guy Pearce, Bill Hunter, Sara Chadwick
Print: Polygram International
     A lengthy, standing ovation in SF's venerable Castro theatre ended
the world premiere of what may prove to be the festival's runaway hit!
A neary full house in the 2,000-seat venue proved that a 10:15 PM
show time on a Sunday night couldn't dampen the film's appeal: take
three drag queens, a wardrobe that wouldn't fit in Imelda Marcos's
closet, add a bus, a soundtrack full of 70s disco divas and a trip
across the outback to Alice Springs, stir up the ingredients with
several secrets, unexpected plot twists and romance, and you have a
prescription guaranteed to lift your spirits.  PRISCILLA is  high camp
comedy, with mainstream appeal that succeeds on nearly every level, a
definite "cross over" candidate if it finds the right distribution.
Imagine the funniest, most life-affirming moments from HAROLD AND
MAUDE, LA CAGE AUX FOLLES, STRICTLY BALLROOM, and BAGDAD CAFE and
you'll have some sense of what a jewel this film is.
     It's worth the price of admission for the costumes and wigs alone!
We haven't seen anything this outrageous since Von Sternberg took
Marlena Dietrich's eyebrows to new heights.  Although the premise for
this film might scare away the less imaginative film goer, for the rest
of us there's something supremely liberating about seeing a silver-lame
coated drag queen, straddling the top of a speeding bus like a champion
water skier, trailed by a 50-foot mylar scarf, lip-synching Opera!  I
don't know about you, but that's something I just can't see too often!
     PRISCILLA is a far cry from PARIS IS BURNING, with its sad,
clown-like drag queens vainly trying to latch on to someone else's
faded glamour.  These girls tear through the heartland of Australia's
homophobia, like a sequined Conestoga wagon, blazing new trails into
the frontiers of possiblity and self-discovery.  Each encounter leaves
the people they meet changed, mostly for the better.  They're living
proof that Goddess placed drag queens on the planet to bring life and
color into our sad and dreary lives.
     Hugo Weaving (of PROOF) as "Mitzi" gets an offer to do a four-week
gig in Alice Springs.  He's joined by Guy Pearce as "Felicia" and
Terence Stamp as "Bernadette" to go westward-ho, scattering sequins and
adventures along the way.  Stephan Elliot's script has almost as many
juicy one-liners as sequins and rivals THE WOMEN for deliciously
bitchy humor.  The screenplay often steers the audience's attention one
way, and then pulls the punchline in another.  Bernadette joins the
trek because his twenty-five-year-old lover has just died.  As the
crane shot descends over the sequined crowd gathered around the grave
site, everyone in the audience immediately draws the conclusion that
the young man died of AIDS.  Heading towards the limo, Berndatte
steams, "cheeky little bugger, he was bleaching his hair in the
bathroom, was overcome by the peroxide fumes, passed out and hit his
head on the tiles!  I told him to go to a salon."
     Although there is one fag bashing, and several intense encounters
with homophobia, neither the characters nor the film ever wallow in
self pity, or take on the status of a victim.  The three drag stars
take life face on, on their own terms, often trading successfully on
their underdog status (much the way the first ROCKY did).
     Terence Stamp (FAR FROM THE MADDING CROWD, THE COLLECTOR) in
his first comedic role, gives a touching and inspired performance as a
tired but regal transsexual who's seen it all.  Unlike other mainstream
actor's, who go over the top doing drag, Stamp brings a quiet sense of
dignity to his Tallulah-esque diva.  If the film gets sufficient
distribution, Stamp may have to make room on his mantle for a little
gold statue next spring.
     Stamp garnered some of the best on-liners in the film, and aims
them with the accuracy of a heat-seeking missile.  He's a scene stealer,
equal to Eve Arden in STAGEDOOR.  When Guy Pearce as "Felicia"
confesses he's always had a fantasy about climbing Ayer's rock in full
drag and heels, Stamp regally flips his tresses, closes his eyes,
counts for just the right beat and rasps, "just what this country
needs, another cock in a frock on the rock!"
     Elliot's script fleshes out his characters quite nicely, belying
most of the stereotypes usually related to drag.  (It's revealed early
on that one of the trio has been "batting for both sides" so to speak,
giving rise to a brief, healthy dose of "heterophobia.")  Speaking of
fleshed out, Guy Pearce needs little help in that arena.  His scantily
clad form, often out of drag, is the stuff of a calendar publisher's
dream!  Pearce is the perfect foil for Stamp's world weary comic
timing.  Hugo Weaving's Mitzi, the more responsible member of the
party, keeps one eye on the road and the uncertain future ahead, in a
highly compelling performance (with considerable "sticking power" for a
comedy).
     Characters encountered along the way are as rich and endearing as
any found in BAGDAD CAFE.  Bill Hunter as the garage mechanic, who
chucks his conventional lifestyle to join the merry trio, makes a
strong mark on the film.  As does Sara Chadwick as the kind of mother
that is the stuff of Jesse Helm's worst nightmares.  I'll avoid any
more plot spoilers, but will say that the "ping pong" scene must be
seen to be believed.
     In the director's talk, Elliott revealed that the costumes by his
friends Lizzy Gardener and Tim Chapell were done on a literal shoe
string.  My favorite was the 60's miniskirt outfit made of cheap
plastic sandels!  Elliott revealed that the natural "bounce" for Stamp's
bosom was achieved by filling condoms with moisturizer.  One scene with
a heavy embrace had to be re-filmed when the condoms popped!  Several of
the costumes used during club performances make eye popping visual puns
(including the Sydney Opera house).
     Any budget restraints on the film were belied by the stunning
camera work and keen sense of lighting.  Frequent interior shots on the
bus never approached claustrophobia due to the variety of imaginative
camera angles.
     Incidentally, director Elliot had originally planned to use real
drag queens.  But as he put it, when he ran an ad announcing the
opportunity to trek across the outback in drag, covered in flies, he
only had one applicant, so he used real actors.  Stamp was chosen from
a list of actors who were considered to be playing "against type."
Elliot never imagined that Stamp would actually accept.  If the film is
seen by the right audience in LA, Stamp's the decision to play
"Bernadette" may prove to be the shrewdest move of his career.
     PRISCILLA doesn't have distribution yet, but it's under
consideration by Polygram.  FAX this review with your vote to see it
to:

Title
Review for Reine Margot, La (1994)
French, with subtitles
Directed by Patrice Chéreau
Cast: Isabelle Adjani, Virna Lisi, Vincent Perez, Julien Rassam,
Jean-Hugues Anglade and Pascall Greggory
     (Warning: very bloody violence and explicit sex; all justified by
the actual historic events depicted.  Do not attend if you cant stand
visceral brutality.)
     This is a GREAT movie: fascinating, entertaining, enlightening,
sensual, top-notch performances and very very accurate for 16th Century
historical look and feel.  Although the costumes are magnificent, they
are often sweaty and bloodstained.  You can almost smell the crowd.
     Set in 1572 France, torn by religious wars between Catholics and
Protestants.  Queen Mother Catherine DeMedici (Virna Lisi in an
astonishing performance) continues to rule France, even though her son,
King Charles IX, has come of age.  The film opens with a marriage
between the Kings Catholic sister, Margot (Adjani), and Henri of
Navarre (Daniel Auteil), a protestant King.  Dimly light scenes
accurately capture sweaty, night interiors as we see tensions mount
between Catholic and Protestant roommates on the eve of the
celebration.
     The St. Bartholomews Day massacre of Protestants (who were wedding
guests of the court) is depicted with visceral realism.  It leads to
intrigue and blood letting that would make any DYNASTY viewers head
spin.  Not for the squeamish or feint of heart.  The screenwriter chose
not to soften the incredible atrocity of the massacre, which provides
for some intense imagery; ladies of the court delicately stepping over
bloody corpses that are being stripped by looters.
     The photography is magnificent, and this is the first historical
film in recent memory with highly believable lighting.  Except for one
dramatically overlight cathedral, most of the interiors seem to be lit
only by grimy windows or candlelight.  Much of the plot revolves around
the newly weds being held in the Louvre as virtual prisoners.  You
share their paranoia about what might be lurking in the inky dark
shadows.
     A good portion of this films visual gifts are provided by four
handsome French actors, who intersect with Margot in a variety of ways
as her brothers and/or lovers.  Its easy to imagine that Pascall
Greggory, as Anjou (next in the line of succession) may well be drawing
from past life memories.  He looks gooood in that long hair and
mustache, and he knows how to broadcast a sense of authority by the way
he rides a horse.  Jean-Hugues Anglade, the smoldering male lead from
BETTY BLUE, plays King Charles.  Heart throb Vincent Perez is luscious
as the Protestant lover, despite the grimy makeup and sweaty costumes.
Queen Margots motivation is no mystery here.  Isabelle Adjani has
evidently discovered a secret fountain of youth; no face lift scars,
and she looks virtually identical to her film persona of 20 years ago.
Be prepared to hate her.   ;-)
     This film will stick with you for a long time.  I highly recommend
seeing it on the big screen, which would prove more revealing for the
magnificent costume detail.  I fear that much of the subtle nighttime
detail would fade into black pixels when viewed on video.  I also find
subtitles more subconscious in larger type in a darkened theatre.  This
is also the kind of film that stirs a lot of audience energy that you'll
miss in your living room.
     Due to the film's historical accuracy, there are no clear cut
protagonists.  Like the courtiers themselves, you may find yourself
dizzied by the constantly changing tides of power and intrigue.  Unlike
most popular Hollywood films, QUEEN MARGOT does not rewrite history to
make any of the characters more appealing than they probably were in
real life.  Thats one of the reasons I liked the film.  Its also one of
the reason others may hate it.

Title
Review for Quiz Show (1994)
     A common complaint amongst film critics is "why aren't there more
literate scripts available?"  QUIZ SHOW gives signs of hope that the
art of writing isn't dead in Hollywood and that we need not only look
to independent films for thoughtful content.  Paul Attanasio's script
takes what could have been a tepid thriller (the Quiz Show scandals of
the late 50s) and delivers a telling parable about the emptiness of the
post war American Dream and the golden bubble that surrounds and
protects TV networks and their sponsors.
     The film is riddled with telling symbols (e.g. a '58 Chrysler, a
radio announcement of Sputnik) but is never heavy handed.  Deft
Direction by Robert Redford and keen performances by Ralph Fiennes,
John Turturro and Rob Morrow  dovetail perfectly with the carefully
honed script.  Redford departs from the usually overlight, "cable TV
quality" sets and camera work so common in recent 20th Century period
pieces.  QUIZ SHOW perfectly captures the colors and textures of the
Eisenhower years.  Although I was only 4 years old when the "Twenty
One" scandal broke, enough of the 50s icons survived throughout my
childhood for me to recognize the authenticity of Redford's almost
tangible palette.  From plastic covered furniture to carefully coifed
contestants, the images ring true from that era of rampant consumerism,
of a generation that had gone through 15 years of depression and world
war without "disposable income," before the manifestation of its
American Dream.
     The film deftly weaves several themes together, from assimilation
and exclusion of Jews from "the good life," to the lengths that a scion
of a literary family will go to to match his father's fame.  Though the
50s audience that is "rocked" by this scandal may initially seem naive
to us, they should appear all too familiar, with our current national
passion for the rise and fall of icons like Michael Jackson or Tonya
Harding.  Charles Van Doren and Herbie Stemple were the overnight mega
celebrities of their day.  The TV audience is almost a fourth main
character, always at the center of the decisions being made on their
behalf.
     At the film's end, the credits roll past slow motion footage of
that same 50s TV audience, mindlessly laughing at some piece of fluff.
Like the distorted mirror that captured a blurred swastika at the end
of CABARET, this "mirror" may reflect an image we're not all that
comfortable with.

Title
Review for Fils du requin, Le (1993)
THE SON OF THE SHARK France, 1993, 90 min.
In French  with English Subtitles 
Director: Agne'S Merlet
Producer:  Francois Fries
Screenplay: Merlet, Santiago Amigorena
Camera: Gerard Simon
Editor: Guy Lecorne, Pierre Chaukroun
Cast: Ludovic Veadendaele, Erick Da Silva, Sandrine Blancke, Maxime Leroux
Print Gaumont
     It's HOME ALONE meets THELMA AND LOUISE.  Two young brothers toss
any sense of connection to their community (or humanity) to the wind
and go on a wild and crazy  crime-spree/romp.  They are possibly the
most annoying child characters since Pippi Longstocking vacated the big
screen sometime in the 70s.  By the way, the film is not intended to be
a comedy.  The vacant feeling one leaves the film with makes any
reviewer resort to clutching at straws to classify the experience.  As
the festival program relates: "As Martin, Vandendaele is extraordinary,
communicating more with his eyes than with words as he draws us, albeit
cautiously, into his lonely, battered world."
     Merlet's directoral debut, which won the international critic's
prize at Venice last year) *is* a technical marvel (stunning
photography, totally believable child acting, an intense story line,
thoughtful directing) but the sum of the parts is far greater than the
final "hole."
     Veadendaele and Da Silva play two young brothers (circa ten and
twelve years old) who are already hardened criminals.  Their mother
abandoned them, and their alcoholic father lives in a vacuum, barely
aware of them.  It's not hard to imagine why!  The merry pranksters run
the gamut from driving a bus over a cliff, breaking windows in a
butcher shop and hauling the meat out into the street, to wrapping
excrement in newspapers, lighting them on fire, and fleeing in giggles
after ringing the door bell.  One brother puts a new spin on cake
decorating by letting his bloody nose drip over the dessert tray in a
cafeteria.
     With little hoydens like that, the director/screenwriter failed if
we're supposed to blame their parents and feel sorry for them.  I found
myself not only starting to "understand" Governor Pete Wilson and his
support of "three strikes and you're out" but ruminating on the
possiblity of lowering the age limit.  (Well, the film's set in France,
so that's no good.)
     The two imps prefer to repeatedly run away from home, or juvenile
hall, and live like the homeless, wrecking a trail of vandalism and
crime where-ever they go.  Agnes Merlet was inspired to write the
screenplay based on a small news article she read.  The fatal flaw with
this film is that there is no arc of development for either the
characters or the audience.  You leave the theatre knowing and feeling
nothing more than you did when you entered (except perhaps, an intense
feeling of disgust.)
     But the most disturbing and offensive element of the film is its
casual attitude towards rape and sexual abuse of young girls.  The
young boys are on the brink of "normal" sexual development.  Not fully
understanding their new found attraction to the opposite sex, they
approach physical relations with girls the same way they deal with
items they steal from the local merchants.  Twice the young boys come
very close to completing a rape with a terrified young girl at knife
point.  Through the preceding scenes of the film, the camera glimpses
these victims as beautiful, but distantly hollow ornaments, much the
way the hubba hubba factor is injected into most music videos.  Not
only do the young boys show no signs of remorse for their actions,
but the girls are completely dropped from the plot after their
abuse, and there are no consequences for the crime whatsoever.  It
is inescapable that the director somehow viewed their criminal
tendencies as "forgivable" or "to be expected" considering their
circumstances.  By the time the second rape scene came around I was
wishing the young French girl was more familiar with the ministrations
of Lorena Bobbit (it might have changed the entire tone of this
review).
     The film's title comes from a book that one of the brothers
constantly reads and rereads.  It is the only tangible relic from his
remote mother's presence.  He constantly reads about fish, and
fantasizes about being "the son of a shark....  I wouldn't be so mean."
On viewing this film, by the last reel one could only wish that sharks
eat their own young.

Title
Review for Ed Wood (1994)
     Film director Ed Wood has a cult following composed of millions of
fans like me, who've poured over repeated viewings of such junkyard
classics as BRIDE OF THE MONSTER and PLAN 9 FROM OUTER SPACE.  How
could such an eccentric character and high camp material possibly
succeed as the premise for another celebrity biography?  With ED WOOD,
producer/director Tim Burton redeems himself after a string of near
misses like THE NIGHTMARE BEFORE CHRISTMAS and EDWARD SCISSORHANDS.
This deliriously funny yet touching portrait succeeds where other bios,
like CHAPLIN failed.
     This film finally balances the mean-spirited portraits of Wood and
Bela Lugosi propagated in Michael Medved's "Golden Turkey" book of the
late '70s.  No doubt, Mr. "Hollywood vs. the USA" will approve of the
mysterious R rating for a film with neither sex nor violence, but a few
cuss words and some tasteful cross dressing.
     Johnny Depp successfully employs the same "lost in his own
world--aw shucks" persona that failed miserably for Jeff Bridges
in TUCKER.  But the biggest surprise is Martin Landau's stunning
performance as the dying, morphine addicted Lugosi.  Landau's amazing
"dual performance" captures every nuance of Lugosi's persona in Wood's
first three films, also broadcasting his tragic humanity on an unspoken
level.  Fans who've previously only laughed at Lugosi's final "I have
no home" speech in BRIDE OF THE MONSTER will gasp, and possibly
stifle sobs, when they see the added level of irony the Laundau and
Burton bring to that scene.
     Burton employs a deliberately deadpan B/W camera, that apes the
unintentionally funny driver's training or "drug" films of the '50s.
He also honors Wood with a few deliberate mistakes, like mismatched
hairstyles for Sara Jessica Parker, in her final scene as Dolores
Fuller.  But the infamous sets of GLEN OR GLENDA and PLAN 9 are
true to the last lamp shade and cardboard tombstone.
     A large ensemble cast credibly replicate Wood's "family" of
eccentrics and outcasts, from Bill Murray (surprisingly on target as
tired old queen Bunny Breckenridge) to Lisa Marie, very true as
Vampira.  The only disappointment is Jeffrey Jones who misses the mark
on my personal favorite, Criswell.
     Expect ED WOOD to be another surprise "cross-over" hit that has
an element of drag, (this time with a hetero central character.) I
predict at least two Oscars next March, certainly one for Landau.
Required viewing.  A video rental of GLEN OR GLENDA ahead of time
will increase your enjoyment immeasurably.  Don't miss the Ed Wood
retrospective at SF's Castro theatre Oct 28th through 31st!

Title
Review for C'est arrivé prčs de chez vous (1992)
     If you are one sick puppy when it comes to "black humor", (e.g.,
you love "dead baby" jokes) this film is a "must see."  I'd give it a
10, but am downgrading it to 8.5 to account for my own perceptions,
warped by being born in a year that they were still conducting above
ground nuclear testing.
     CONCEPT: a professional hit man is followed during every waking
moment by a documentary film crew who want to "capture it all."
Including *brutally* realistic executions, a "Cold Blood" type killing
of a suburban family, and more.  Spice it up by making the subject of
the documentary an insufferable, mugging, poet-wanna-be and media
addict, with attitudes about women that went out with the Eisenhower
era, and who performs chamber music in his spare time.
     The grainy, shaky camerawork is eerily reminiscent of Marcel
Ophuls's epic, THE SORROW AND THE PITY.  Many of the supporting
characters are tongue in cheek portrayals of Belgium's answer to "family
values."  A lot of the humor is indescribable, (the long-suffering "I'm
not going to let this affect my demeanor" look on the mother's face when
the injured hit-man's hospital room mate goes berserk and starts singing
a song about "ka ka.")  The camera crew themselves occasionally end up
on film, for instance when the sound man stuffs the boom under his
arm-pit and helps stuff the slain taxi driver into the trunk.  After
drinks at a sleazy pub the hit man laments, "sheesh, I'm ready for bed
and forgot about the cab driver in the trunk ... now I'll have to head
out to the quarry first."  (Done in the vein of the old "please, Mother,
I'd rather do it *myself*" Anacin TV commercials.)
     Obviously filmed on a shoe-string, the camera-work is amazingly
versatile, and allows for nary a dull moment.  (Several times in the
film, the director confesses that they are running out of money, and the
hit man makes another "hit" to help pay for the film stock.)  Even in
dingy pubs, light by bare light bulbs, you can almost feel the grease on
the pressed tin wall panels.  Many of the settings are direct steals
from well-known films.  On one assignment, the hit man is chasing his
victim through an abandoned factory, and some shots are Xerox copies of
DOA or the bell tower scene of NIAGARA.  The brutal yet some-how
still funny slaying of a suburban family has black-hole hallways
straight out of IN COLD BLOOD.
     Although Benoit Peolvoorde (who at times has a spooky resemblance
to Lee Harvey Oswald) is thoroughly engaging as the star-struck hit man,
perhaps the most fascinating character is the camera itself.  Although
we never see the cameraman, we create our own images of what he must
look like.  Walking through factories and back streets, with praying
mantis-like side glances into rooms and dirty sinks ... we get a
slightly exaggerated portrayal of our *own* voyeurism.
     Supporting cast is composed entirely of the director's friends,
using their *real* names.
     The film *is* low-budget, and not without its rough spots.  (For
instance, Benoit's overblown posturing, with "solutions" outside a
housing project, that lapses so far into mugging that your index finger
starts itching to reach for your tonsils.)  But overall, it is a *very*
fresh and original package of entertainment.
     I recall reading an article in the SF CHRONICLE, something to the
effect that the film makers (they star and film) are dealing directly
with the few screens that will show this epic.  So if you see it listed
in *your* neighborhood, change your plans and go.  Although this film
wouldn't suffer terribly in the transition to the boob tube, I wouldn't
hold my breath waiting for it to show up at Blockbuster.

Title
Review for Tango Argentino (1992)
IN A NUTSHELL: Not to be confused with the B'way show of the late 80's,
this wise and winning film has the off-beat humor of BREAD AND
CHOCOLATE and the heart-wrenching personal involvement of NIGHT OF
SHOOTING STARS, but resembles neither of them in style or content. It
brilliantly portrays the miracle of rebirth that can happen when the
elderly and young are thrown together, and left to their own devices to
create a real "family."
Date Released: not yet (no distributor)
Country of Origin: Yugoslavia/Serbia
Running Length:   1:33
Rating: none. Network TV-levels of sexual situations.
Cast: Nikola Zarkovic, Miki Manojlovic, Ina Gogalova, Mija Aleksic
Director/Producer: Goran Paskaljevic
Screenplay: Gordan Mihic
Camera: Milan Spasic
Editor: Olga Skrigin, Olga Obradov
     About every ten years, usually on a rainy Sunday afternoon, you
stumble upon some unheard of foreign film, that so touches your mind
and soul, you feel as if you're on a mission to get *everyone* you know
to see this. I'm doubly burdened with such a mission by TANGO
ARGENTINO, as there is no distributor.  (North American premiere, Sun
May 2, 1993 @ San Francisco Film Festival.)
     Set in that brief golden bubble of time, between the fall of
Communism in Yugoslavia, and the outbreak of the current bloody Civil
War the movie was made almost entirely in Belgrade (now in Serbia).
the film beautifully portrays the breakdown of one family, and the
wondrous creation of a new one.  Director Goran Paskaljevic chose
12-year Nikola Sarkovic from over 800 boys.  Their teamwork has brought
one of the year's most compelling performances to the screen.  The film
was completed in Aug 92, only days before the escalation of the bloody
civil war in Serbia that now makes local creation of *any* films
impossible.  This is one film (should distribution occur) that you
simply can not afford to miss viewing.
     Nikola plays a gritty young capitalist-wanna be.  He has far more
sense and maturity with money than either of his parents, (his
self-obsessed mother, Ina Gogalova, or philandering father, Miki
Manojlovic).  While his father dreams unrealistically of building a home
based on income from being a wedding musician, Nikola dreams of getting
a pop corn machine at the race track, so his family can make "real"
money.  The boy has gradually assumed many of his parent's adult
responsibilities.  He helps relieve his mother, by caring for her elderly
charges, and even surreptitiously prompts his father with the right
things to say to overcome serious marital rifts based on the father's
philandering.
     After his father gets a promotion in a music academy, with strings
attached, Nikola steps in to center stage to hold things together.  He
must care for the three elderly charges his mother runs errands for
(she's in Bulgaria seeking a cure for the ailing sister) *and* he must
take on two new charges, relatives of his father's boss.  Nikola has
already grown close to Senor Julio Popovitch (brilliantly portrayed by
former Yugo mega pop singer, Mija Aleksic.) Nikola finds a deep
friendship with the spunky old Tango singer who refuses to "give in,"
even though he's virtually bed-ridden.  In the director's talk after the
screening, Paskaljevic revealed that the ailing Aleksic hadn't been
able to work for 7 years.  He was only allowed to work for two to three
hours a day, with his doctor in attendance.  With Life imitating Art,
this wonderful performer grew stronger and stronger as the film
progressed, and his doctor's new "prescription" is for Aleksic to make
more films!
With the company of a dog he's inherited from a recently deceased "client,"
the pragmatic  Nikola decides to simultaneously baby sit all of his
elderly charges by bringing them together in a friendship club.  Therein the
magic of this film begins.  Like nearly dry flowers in a spring rain, these
wonderful old people "bloom" through friendship, romance, and a new-found
sense of purpose.  The gift of Goran Paskaljevic's direction prevents this
from turning into sappy, sentimental sop like SMALL CHANGE.  In a sense,
each of Nikola's charges finds their own "tango," or dance of life.  The
film follows a path pitted with the very cul 'd sacs and dead ends that
await any of us cursed with living long enough to become a "bother" to our
adult children.
     Much of the film's freshness comes from a deft script and
Zarkovic's no-nonsense portrayal of the determined twelve-year-old.  Far
from being the lovable "artful dodger" type of moppet most of us were
weaned on in countless Disney films, this is a pint-sized "adult" with
a mission.  He'll stop at nothing to build a stable financial base for
his family.  Like many work-a-holic adults, he's become so enmeshed in
enabling others, that he's forgotten how to follow his own bliss.  Only
briefly, near the end of the film, (when we see Nikola frolicking nude
on a Montenegro beach under the loving, watchful eyes of his "tango"
friend), do we see him act freely and fully as a child.   While his
"real" family crumbles around him, he unknowingly brings together a
warm and nourishing "extended" family.   This family will touch your
heart and stay with you a very long, long time.
     Warning: you may leave the theatre wet and achey, from body
constrictions and weeping that follow the sea-like emotional swell of
this film.  But you *will* leave the theatre reaffirming that, even
under the shadow of war or domestic violence, there are always a few
rare souls who can and *will* find a way to build true "family values,"
with or without their blood relations.  That knowing is the film's
ultimate gift.
INFORMATION ON OBTAINING PRINT OR DISTRIBUTION RIGHTS:
(please request this film at your local Rep. Film house.)

Title
Review for Piano, The (1993)
Seen in English with French subtitles at the Gaumont Gran Ecran Cinema, 
Place d' Italia, Paris
Rating: (1 to 10) ... "off the scale"...  Rated "RV" for "required viewing"
     Since causing a seven-minute standing ovation at its world
premiere in Cannes this year, Jane Campion's film has sent waves of
anticipation across the Atlantic for its impending opening in North
America.  Upon seeing it, you may wonder if seven minutes was enough
recognition for this brilliant film!  Campion (ANGEL AT MY TABLE,
SWEETIE) earned her Palm d' Or award (the first ever for a woman
director) for this brilliant, timeless film.  THE PIANO is destined to
join the pantheon of classics inhabited by CHILDREN OF THE PARADISE,
SHOP ON MAIN STREET, THE HEIRESS, and CITIZEN KANE.  Its simple
dignity and heart stopping beauty will literally take your breath
away.
     Campion's deft direction and brilliantly original screenplay have
drawn stunning performances from the unlikely cast of Holly Hunter, Sam
Neill and Harvey Keitel.  (After RESERVOIR DOGS and THE BAD LIEUTENANT,
the last place you'd expect to see Keitel is in a reverently hushed Art
House....)  The three leads form a love triangle, centered around a
mute woman, (whose unbreakable will transforms all of the
participants).  Campion exercises remarkable skill in keeping the
amazing performances subdued enough to not overpower the beautifully
tender story-line.
     Holly Hunter's heart-stopping, speechless performance demands
multiple viewings, and could well become a text for film students.
Actress and director had every opportunity to go too far in making this
a mawkish, sentimental "shoe-in" for the Oscars.  Their restraint and
subtly lets the brilliance of Hunter's performance creep up on you,
and allows you the freedom to  "take in" the rest of the film.  You
will not recognize Hunter as the "perky" gamin from BROADCAST NEWS or
MISS FIRECRACKER.  Her wan face transmits "messages" and subtexts
more effectively than any performance I've seen since the advent of
sound in films.  Unlike those of silent films, Campion's characters are
richly drawn, complex, and may leave you vacillating in your sympathy
with all of the characters.
     Though a startlingly original film, THE PIANO has a lot in
common with the best of great Silent cniema.  It has a simple premise,
a plot that maintains the clarity of a biblical parable, and wonderful
use of symbols and counterpoints ... a woman "without a voice" in a
man's world ... a piano left out in the rain ... a small child running
through the mud with angel wings ... a church pageant about Bluebeard's
wives ... the "fore-shadowing" of a limb being amputated....  The film
leaves many stunning images indelibly engraved in your memory (I saw
the film five nights ago, and it's still with me.)
     Lee Swarth's incredibly clear soundtrack captures the emotion
contained in each piano note, the incessant buzz of flies, the constant
sound of mud and rain.  (Michael Nyman is responsible for the
compelling score.)  The cinematography (didn't catch name off the
titles) is an equal match for the magnificence of story and
performance.  New Zealand literally looks like the ends of the earth
though this telling camera; often the interior scenes resemble lovingly
hand-tinted photos from the last century.
     On the surface, it would be tempting to label this a "woman's
film," this time about a wronged mail-order bride from the last
century, who has to endure the indignities of her husband's "property
rights."  Campion's screenplay, however, defines Ada (Hunter) as a
complete and complex woman, whose "will" at times attracts or repulses
you.  The men are no less fully drawn than Hunter's character.  The
performances so pull you into the present moment that you won't be able
to anticipate the film's ending.
     We only hear Hunter's voice  briefly, at the beginning of the
film, as "the voice in my mind."  (She's been mute since she was 6,
cause unknown).  Hunter's forbidding demeanor is counterpointed by her
free-spirited child-daughter (a phenomenal performance by Anna
Paquin).  At times, mother and daughter seem like aspects of the same
person, the daughter almost "the inner child" exposed to the outside
world.  They share a secret language, which supplements Hunter's
frequent need to spell out her needs with a pad and pencil.
     Hunter's character needs little interpretation for those drawn
into her orbit.  Her face tells all.  Hunter's piano is her "voice,"
which she plays with a soul-shattering touch.  (Throughout the film I
was marveling over how convincing Hunter was on the keyboard, wondering
who was "really" playing it, and deciding to buy the soundtrack--the
credits shocked me with the line "piano solos played by Holly
Hunter"--her amazing range of talents doesn't stop with acting!)
Hunter, a mute, unwed mother, is married off, sight unseen, to a
recluse in New Zealand (Sam Neill).  Hunter, daughter, and piano are
unceremoniously dumped off on a blustery, remote beach, where her
husband-to-be has missed his appointed meeting.  One of the most
unforgettable images is of mother and daughter spending their first
night ashore beneath her hoop skirt, which makes an impromptu
"igloo."  Neil hadn't planned on transporting a piano, so it is left
on the beach "to be picked up later."  Later, the look on Hunter's face
through a rain streaked window (echoing her unspeakable horror over the
piano warping on the beach) ranks with Lillian Gish's visage through
the sand-covered window in THE WIND.  (In the Paris theatre where I
saw THE PIANO, I could hear several members of a sophisticated-looking
audience suck in their breath at that point ... by the end of the film I
was very used to that sound.)
     Without consulting his new wife, Neil decides to swap the piano
(including "lessons") to back-woodsman Harvey Keitel for a few acres
of land.  Keitel suggested the deal, having had a catharsis of sorts
while watching Hunter play the piano, still boxed, on the beach.
Hunter is eventually drawn into a labrynth of negotiations and
deceptions to maintain access to her "voice."  Keitel is gradually
transformed by his "lessons," and by the film's end, you've released
every prejudice or preconceived notion you had about his character.
     The three leads are wonderfully backlight by a rich supporting
cast, (an ingredient entirely missing from big budget "star
vehicles").  THE PIANO is the type of film Hollywood seems to have
forgotten how to make.  It has every ingredient destined to make it a
classic as enduring as THE MAGNIFICENT AMBERSONS, (another film made
without Hollywood's support.)
     A seven-minute standing ovation at Cannes?  Not half long enough,
in my book, for a woman from the other side of the world who's taught
us to dream again, and who has delivered the promise that enduring film
classics can and will be made in our lifetime.

Title
Review for Homme sur les quais, L' (1993)
THE MAN BY THE SHORE France, 1993, 101 min.
In French and Creole with English Subtitles Director: Raoul Peck
Producer: Pascal Verroust Screenplay: Peck, Andre' Grall Camera: Armand marco
Editor: Jaques Comets
Cast: Jennifer Zubar, Tolo Bissanthe, Jean-Michel Martial, Patrick Rameau Print:
Frouma Films International
     A starkly simple and engaging tale, of the escalation of violence
and ascension of dictatorship in 1960's Haiti seen through the eyes of
a young girl.  Soft pastel images and idyllic landscape are punctuated
by blood and violence, mostly done thankfully from a distance.
     The film's greatest accomplishment is showing the horror of
repression through mundane, everyday events (e.g., the wife of the local
military ruler deciding she can return a pair of well-worn shoes,
demanding a full refund) escalates to disastrous consequences.  The
film is sparse on dialogue and is very non-linear; some scenes and
sequences repeat.  The film is deliberately edited to reflect the
jumbled memories of childhood.
     Due to this, and the camera's occasional over-lingering embrace of
household objects, a heavy dose of patience is required in the second
and third reel.  But it's worth the wait.  The memories come together
with tremendous clarity in the final thirty-five minutes of the film.
     THE MAN BY THE SHORE is also refreshing in that there is only one
Euro/White face in the entire film.  For American audiences, it is an
exhilarating experience to see blacks honestly portrayed, completely
free of stereotypes.  I can't remember the last film I've seen with a
large black cast that didn't involve drugs or prostitution.  The dusky
skin tones are beautifully illumined in a variety of lighting
situations, the acting subtle and elegant.  Portraying repressed,
silenced characters, the actors have to make much out of little
dialogue.  There is a scene in church, where the local warload sits
serenely amidst a sea of faces, faces of the survivors of his victims.
The image conveys far more than words or music could.
     Well worth seeing.  Better on a big screen than it would be on
video.  Due to subtitles, don't expect this one on PBS.

Title
Review for Bad Lieutenant (1992)
     Avoid this film at all costs (even eventual cable/video rental)
because it is an overinflated, crashing bore!  Roger Ebert gave it
"highest rating," and the "little man" in the Chronicle is falling out
of his chair.  Ironically, it's playing at the 438-seat Gateway in San
Francisco, where ridiculous reviews are causing long lines, and
sell-outs, adding to the myth that this is a real find.  (Hey, it fooled
me!)
     It's actually "R"-rated content, but because Americans (or mainly
the white males that run Hollywood) are uncomfortable with extended
views of another man's penis, it copped an NC-17.  Fortunately,
teenagers won't be subjected to the same eyelid-tugging snooze-pusher
that I went through.  There is also the controversy of a nun being raped
on an altar, and the "F"-word in grafitti on the altar.
     Why is this film a bore?  80% of it is watching Harvey Kietel snort
coke in a variety of locations, or shooting up junk and going comatose.
We never learn his, or most of the characters' names.  I think the film
could have been more interesting or worthwhile if it were set earlier in
the Lieutenant's addiction cycle when there were enough brain cells for
him to show some character development or motivation.  Neither are
present in this film.  What Ebert lauded as Keitel's "performance of a
lifetime" amounts to a convincing portrayal of a junkie cop trying to
stay upright, negotiate walking down stairs, driving a car, and
supposedly acting "normal" enough to keep his job.
     It is inconceivable that non-addicted cops would entrust tens of
thousands of dollars in World Series bets to anyone in Kietel's medical
condition.
     What about the "nun" thing?  Unless you are a vitriolic "recovering
Catholic," (who gets off on seeing sacred icons violated) or a "good
Catholic" (who can't go to this film anyway,) you'll probably "feel"
absolutely nothing during the violation of the nun on the altar.  It is
incredibly stagy, and has the suspicious look of gratuitous sex tossed
in to keep the crowd awake.  The nun and her violators are made to look
way too appealing, and due to colored filters and moody, jumpy
photography, you get the eerie feeling you just turned on one of
Cinemax's softcore 1 AM epics.  One of the rapists has the same kind of
muscled nude back you see on the cover of many Romance Novels.  (Maybe
they're trying for a title like "Love's Burning Chalice"?)
     The nun's refusal to identify her attackers (who are students from
her class whom she recognized) is supposedly the crux of the film and
its denouement.  Unfortunately, the actress who plays the nun (we don't
find out her character's name either) is merely gorgeous and can't act.
Her "Jesus would have seen it this way," stance is about as believable
as Harvey Kietel escaping the notice of internal affairs.  Harvey
Kietel's "big moment" is when he completely "loses it," has a mental
breakdown in church, and while supplicant on his knees actually "sees"
Jesus and starts swearing at him (another reason for the NC-17, I
suppose.)  Unfortunately, you have to repress the urge to laugh because
it's nearly a carbon copy of Patty Duke's overblown final scene as
"Neely O'Hare" in VALLEY OF THE DOLLS where she falls to her knees in
the alley and cries "God?  God?  Is that *you*?"  (VALLEY is coming to
San Francisco's Castro Monday January 11 and to the Sashmill in Santa
Cruz Sunday January 31.)
     I think this film falls into the same class as LAST TANGO IN
PARIS" an overated bore of a film that might provide enough prurient
interest for some middle-aged critics to "get off on," but for the rest
of us, tune into Cinemax at 1 AM and you get a whole lot more of the
same thing and at least the bodies are worth looking at.  (P.S. That
really is Harvey Kietel's body on the poster/movie ad, unfortunately
its attached to Harvey Kietel's face!)
     If this is the director's way of therapizing as a recovering
Catholic, we can only wish that he had taken Sinead O'Conner's route,
which was a lot quicker, and like jerking a Band-Aid off a hairy arm, a
lot less painful than this tepid, two-hour tug.

Title
Review for Lektionen in Finsternis (1992)
     Herzog describes this film as a "poetic vision of the new
landscapes which have emerged in Kuwait --- a national park of the
future."  The film is difficult to classify, not quite a documentary,
more akin to a silent film with titles, a few voice overs, and a
compelling score (Wagner, Prokofiev, Mahler and others).  The
compelling, surrealistic images, shot from the ground and helicopter,
let you draw your own conclusions about the conflict.  The film holds
your attention with same rubber necking fascination that makes us slow
down and scan a bad highway accident.
     There are a few segments where local Kuwaitis try to express their
horror (e.g., a mother talking about her child who lost ability to
speak).  Though many of the images are horrific or apocalyptic, there is
often a weird sort of beauty to the images.  The darkened skies over
dark blue water are reminiscent of oil paintings by old Flemish
masters.
     Herzog was at the screening, live and in person.  He revealed that
for this film, in some sequences he had the soundtrack picked out, and
he sought images that matched what he heard.  The film was made during
the last week that the oil fires were burning.  The crew trying to put
out the fires have a weird anonymous look with their asbestos gear and
masks.  Herzog says that the fires were so hot, that in a few cases the
microphones melted, and often the soles of their boots would fuse to
the sand.  The print is remarkably unspoiled, and it makes you wonder
what kind of cameras were used.  It's obvious in most of the shots that
it's not a zoom lens, or blown-up shot.  Herzog also says he met Klaus
Kinski when he was 13 and Kinski was a 25-year-old boarder in the same
run-down flat.  Kinski used to lock himself up in the bathroom for
hours at a time.  Herzog also says he shot NOSFERTU by necessity, and
kept it as close to the original silent in imagery as possible.  "I felt
like I was passing over water with no bottom.  Nosferatu let me get my
feet on solid ground again."
     LESSONS OF DARKNESS is as enigmatic as its maker and that final
quote.  Not to be missed.

Title
Review for Fear of a Black Hat (1993)
World Premiere Jan 23/24 at Sundance Film Festival, UT
     FEAR OF A BLACK HAT presents a moral dilemma, in that it clearly
"steals" from SPINAL TAP.  But like an alchemist, black baby boomer
Rusty Cundieff has improved the content, and what he delivers is "solid
gold."  Members of the younger and more moral generation, beware.
     CONCEPT: "Nina Blackburn" follows a Rap group, "NWH" (Niggas with
Hats) across the country on their "Itchy Dick" tour to make a
documentary about this "art form".  The performers give deadpan
explanations for why songs like "Kill Whitey" aren't racist or
potentially an invitation to violence.  ("You see, man, we just meant
this *one* whitey, not all o' 'em.")  The actors are convincing in
taking themselves and the songs totally seriously, which creates high
camp comedy.  Though ludicrous explanations for why the "butt" is like
society cross the line on good taste, only the comfort level of
mainstreamers who avoid rap music like the plague would be violated.
(P.S.  If you were upset by my review of MAN BITES DOG, definitely do
*not* see this film!)
     Up-to-the-minute issues are exploited (e.g., the rappers being
interviewed with riot-ruined Central L.A. in the background, an
interview on MTV where the lead female backup singer is accused of
lipsynching in a CC Company "Everybody Dance" send-up.)  You'll savor
the video's images of her struggling with her out of control scarf,
sandwiched between bobbing fluorescent tubes.
     The entirely original soundtrack is sheer genius, and if you didn't
pay close attention to the lyrics, it could pass for the real article.
We can only hope that the soundtrack will soon be released, a la SPINAL
TAP.
     Though this film owes more than the national debt to SPINAL TAP, it
benefits from our intervening 10 years worth of exposure to MTV.  The
director/writer *knows* his target, and a half dozen take-offs on MTV
videos interspersed throughout the film will have you rolling in the
aisles.  Many a scene is a virtual xerox of SPINAL TAP, (for instance
when NWH is stalled from an entrance by an uninformed security guard,
props don't show up and they're expected to perform with*out* hats, one
member showing off his collection of assalt weapons instead of
amplifiers.)  Some of the steals are brilliant improvements, for
instance: instead of showing the audience the "Sniff the Glove" album
cover, as in SPINAL TAP, this film lets you deliciously create your own
depraved image of an unshown album cover that features 15 white cops in
highly submissive positions.
     The film is spray painted with non-stop profanities, and racy
images, hence almost anything quoted from the film will suffer being
taken out of context.
     One of the stronger moments in the film is when NWH appears in a
grammar school class room, with their hated rival rap group, as part of
the "Rappers Against Violence" program.  You can imagine the result.
One false move and this scene would have fizzled.  It didn't.
     Rusty Cundieff as writer/director/lead actor is clearly having the
time of his life making this film.  And the audience won't feel left
out.  Cundieff walks a fine line in that he runs the risk of magnifying
overplayed racial stereotypes.  However, with black actors and director,
fully in control of the film's content, slyly winking at the audience
through the ridiculous lyrics, the effect at Sundance was blacks and
whites laughing out of control, together.
     I don't know if a distributor has picked up this film or not, but
it'll probably at least make midnight shows in rep houses.  Judging by
the audience reaction at Sundance, it stood a fair chance to win
competition as the audience favorite.

Title
Review for Just Another Girl on the I.R.T. (1992)
World Premiere Jan 22 at Sundance Film Festival, UT
Q&A with Director/Producers
     I don't remember the last time I saw a film so emotionally
involving and brilliant that at times it was difficult to hear the
soundtrack over the uncontrolled sobbing in the audience!  Or the last
time I left a theatre with my stomach muscles aching from emotional
constrictions.   Or the last time I felt "older and wiser" as a result
of 94 minutes of light and shadows thrown against a screen.
     Director/Writer Leslie Harris breaks rich new ground: a compelling,
involving and totally believable portrayal of high school students, from
a Black Woman's viewpoint.  Ariyan Johnson as the appealing lead,
"Chantel" seemingly has it all: looks, brains, popularity, and attitude
with a capital "A".  Nothing seems to phase her, from snotty yuppy
shoppers in the store where she works, to anal retentive high school
teachers who are out of touch with the realities of the student body.
Chantel feels insulated by her good grades, and gutsy determination to
get out of the Brooklyn project housing that trapped her parents.
     When the unthinkable comes along to break Chantel's bubble, she 
desperately clings to denial, and any device imaginable to preserve her
familiar world.  I'll avoid a spoiler, but be prepared for a 
gut-wrenching emotionally charged scene, in which you feel almost
dragged into her body to experience her pain and isolation with her.  It
is Directing, Acting and Movie Making at it's Finest!
     Chantel's "attitude" is transformed by her experiences, as she
painfully turns a tragedy into something of an opportunity.  By the end
of the film you will feel that you intimately know this extraordinary
young woman, and you will grieve your separation from her, and her
friends, when the house lights come up.
     Director Leslie Harris turned her own roadblocks into a gold mine
as well.  In the nearly two years it took to raise the money for this
film, she interviewed and got to know hundreds of young teens in
Brooklyn's mostly black high schools.  Her sensitive ear has brought us
some of the freshest and most authentic scenes with teens of *any* color
ever to be photographed.  Months of rehearsals enabled the bullet train
schedule the project was shot under.  As a result, this film is the
ride of your life.
     Laughter and tears are often in competition.  Chantel and two of
her girl friends compare notes on sex.  You are confronted with the
frightening denial many teens labor under today.  "Everybody knows you
can only get AIDS from some dude who's been doing drugs, and girlfriend,
I don't go to bed with no one like that!"  "I can't make him wear that
thing!" and worse.  The scene is shot with a unexpected realism that is
at once endearing and frightening.
     Ariyan Johnson delivers a knock out performance ... she *is*
Chantel.  And you will feel the richer for knowing her.  Ebony Jerido as
Chantel's best girlfriend is one of the most indispensable supporting
actresses I've ever seen.  You will envy the richness of their
friendship, and the depth of their communication.  Harris's deft
direction also makes the male actors very compelling in spite of some
"unforgivable" behavior on the part of one of them.
     During the Q and A session, one Afro-American in the audience said,
"thank you for finally giving me a film with black people who *look*
like black people."  Though Ariayn as Chantel is almost magazine-spread
beautiful, most of the cast have lips or hips too thick to match the
finally chiseled, mocha-skinned actors that casting agents seek in
Hollywood.  Viewing this film, you realize what a tragic loss it has
been that such believable actors have been kept away from a larger
audience.  Thankfully, Leslie Harris and Erwin Wilson are changing that.
PLUSES: The film has a knockout soundtrack, with mostly original rap
songs composed for the film (forgot the musicians name, but his nickname
is "VietNam" something.)  Lyrics slyly underscore and foreshadow much of
what takes place.  Brilliant (how many times have I used that word) and
economic use of the camera hides the fact that the film's budget ranged
around $140K.  If it weren't for a few grainy night scenes, you'd peg it
for about $2mil.
*New Ground* in that Chantel's parents emerge as real human beings, with
fully drawn hearts, minds and their own emotional baggage, vs. the
cardboard cutouts that usually pass for parents in Hollywood "coming of
age" films.
GOOD NEWS: MiraMax has picked up the distribution to this film which
hits screens on February 21st!  Video or TV viewing would border on the
criminally insane.  Only a full screen and your presence in a darkened
auditorium will allow you to fully experience this brilliant (!)
offering.  Be prepared to leave the theatre a different person than you
were when you walked in.
Though it has been 23 years since I was Chantel's age, or had a trace of
her "attitude," this film is so involving that at times I forgot what
sex or color I was!  Mainstream critics will be tempted to peg this as
another SHE'S GOTTA HAVE IT.  Don't be deceived.  Though Harris is a
long overdue new voice on the cinema scene, her brilliant first film
speaks directly to *anyone* watching who can listen with an open heart.

Title
Review for Baraka (1992)
     Five years in the making ... 24 countries ... 70mm camera format
... a sea of sight and sound returns again and again to man's
search for meaning ... this is a "visual poem" that will leave you with
the hypnotic feeling you get after viewing films in one of those OmniMax
theatres.
     The film contains no narration or titles.  Those of us with linear
Western/Euro minds will be frustrated for the first half hour or so,
trying to guess all the locations, or exactly what type of religious
ritual is going on.  Eventually it hits you, the "sameness" of many
people of many races/beliefs/persuasions.  The priests/nuns hemlines
change, the head gear is different, they may genuflect in a different
direction, but they are all reaching out to the same creator, the
same mystery.  Whatever religious propensity you have gradually melts
away as you catch unexpected glimpses of yourself in someone elses
eyes.
     My only frustration with the film is that some of the sequences
weren't long enough.  A seductively rotating camera surrounded by
whirling dervishes in a beautiful Turkish mosque could have gone on for
another ten minutes as far as I was concerned.  I felt myself reaching
for the rewind button on the "remote" as the camera casually glided
through a mosque of unearthly beauty (in Iran, I think) where all of
the tiles were tiny mirrors of different colors that refracted light
with the rainbow effect of the finest lead crystal.
     The film introduces a new "time-lapse" photography in the 70mm
format, in which the camera gradually moves on sensual track shots,
while the heavens rotate in the background.  It tempts one to wonder
whether projected backgrounds or sandwich shots were used to capture
the swiftly fleeing clouds while the camera moves into an arch rock in
Utah, for instance.  The slowly tracking time lapse camera carries us
through door ways in Angor Wat while moonlight shadow swiftly course
by, very much like being in a memorable Technicolor dream.
     Many of the images are emotionally compelling and unforgettable;
the implacable face of a rain forest pigmy juxtaposed with the murder
of a tree, the ancient, wizened serenity of a mountain monkey in a
natural hot spring spa in the mountains of Japan ... the monkey's face
seems to express the world weary concern over so much of the human
damage depicted in the film.
     Many speeded-up shots deliberately force us to see ourselves,
massed at a city crosswalk, then streaming across like army ants.  The
parallels to insects on the rain forest floor trying to escape another
fallen tree is inescapable.  The image of humans in India rummaging
through an apparently endless garbage dump will stop your breath.
     BARAKA is the Sufi word for "blessing" or "the breath."
Cinematographer/director Ron Fricke (KOYAANISQATSI) and
producer/co-editor Mark Magidson made three complete journeys around
the world.  The soundtrack, which captures everything from Tibetan
bells to night bird calls with amazing clarity, gives the film perfect
balance.  I didn't catch the name of the third person who assisted
Frick and Magidson in the world-class editing.
     The film is difficult to classify, but you just may feel like
joining the Green Party, or the Sierra Club after you've seen it.
Big-screen viewing is a must.  The film will lose at least 80% of it's
impact in any video (even letterbox) format.  Watch for it at an
arthouse near you.

Title
Review for Into the West (1992)
(Not in release yet, I saw the world premiere at Sundance Film  Festival
in Utah, and had the privilege of meeting Gabriel Byrne in person at the
reception.  He looks ten years younger in person.)
     A definite "must see" if you have kids, this film is everything
that the annoying Mark Lester vehicles of the early 70's were not.  From
an adult perspective, the film is flawed by too many irons in the fire
that go cool by the time it climaxes.  Ellen Barkin has a throw-away
role as the female, non-love interest, though she does a lot with the
scant material thrown her way.  Nothing is done with the evident
chemistry between her and real-life husband Byrne.
SYNOPSIS: Byrne plays a pathetic, yet appealing alcoholic father with
two young sons.  Grieved over his wife's death, he rejected his gypsy
ways (part of the "travellers" ... Ireland's itinerant tinkerers) to
settle down in the squalor of Dublin's slums.  Byrne's father appears
with a mysterious white stallion, whom the boys immediately adopt.
Heart tugging humor over the boys' attempts to keep the horse "hidden"
in their one bedroom apartment.  Long arm of the law steps in to dispose
of the horse.   Discovering the horse's new owner/home (they see it in
jumping competition on TV) the young lads decide to kidnap/rescue the
horse and escape "into the west," into a mythical kingdom their
grandfather has told them about.
From there, the film moves in unexpected directions, as the horse takes
on mythic, spiritual qualities, becoming a catalyst to help Byrne
reclaim his lost heritage, and aiding the boys in reconciling 
themselves with their mother's death.
STRENGTHS: Newell has drawn superb performances from the two boys, who
take up about 80% of the film's screen time.  Their acting is so sincere
and un-self-conscious that you suspect "invisible" cameras were employed.
Ireland has a lot to teach Hollywood when it comes to child actors!  As
an adult you may be able to get more "into the film" by drawing
parallels to a reclaimed "child within."  It is overall a taught, well
defined script, balanced by a beautiful musical score with lots of
Celtic harp, and *magnificent* photography.  The film will help promote
some of the richness of Celtic culture to a broad, international
audience.  The film also demonstrates the decent "family entertainment"
isn't dead on the American film scene.  It is a breath of fresh air
compared to insubstantial tripe like "Home Alone 2"
KNOCKS: some of the violence, though brief, may be too intense for
younger children.  (6 and under) It appears as if the writer/director
got so entranced with the kids' escape from an unloving adult world,
that they simply forgot some untied knots involving the manic villain, and
Byrne as the father attempting to redeem himself.  You may have to
suppress a few laughs in the films climax in which some clumsy visuals
are employed to help us "see" what the children see.
RECOMMENDATION: although the film has sweeping, magnificent
cinematography (you will want your next vacation in Ireland) not much
would be lost by waiting for the video, or viewing it on an airplane,
where it will no doubt soon appear.  If you have children in your
family, it is a "must see" film, and your enjoyment would be augmented
by a child's enthusiastic reaction.  American film critics will probably
not be fair to this film, due to the flaws mentioned above.  I predict a
short run in theatres stateside.

Title
Review for Fresh Kill (1994)
FRESH KILL USA 1994, 80 min
Director: Shu Lea Cheang --  Producer:  Cheang, Jennifer Fong
Screenplay: Jessica Hagedorn -- 
Camera: Jane Castle
Editor: Lauren Zuckerman
Cast: Sarita Chaudhury, Erin McMurty, Laurie Carlos, Jose Zuniga
Seen: at SF Film Festival, Kabuki Theatres, April 29th
     A delightful, satirical romp that works on nearly every level,
reminiscent of BUCKAROO BANZAI and LIQUID SKY.  Raw fish lips have
become the rage in trendy New York restaurants.  Contaminated fish from
Orchid Island (where nuclear waste is dumped, in real life) shows
up, and the unwelcomed side effects begin.  Yuppies begin speaking in
tongues; pets glow in the dark and spontaneously combust.  A lesbian
couple (one of whom works in the restaurant) suspect that "something is
up," and the trauma hits home when their daughter disappears.
     The cast is a rainbow of racial and ethnic types.  An East Indian
has a native American Indian father.  A Hispanic friend constantly
recites passages from Lorca, an African American woman with a cable
access show called "Ask Minny" speaks out about the global conspiracy
by "GX" (who's logo and TV ad campaigns look suspiciously like "GE, we
bring good things to light), the romantic male lead is a scrumptious
Japanese-American actor (who deserves more, more screen time)....
     Many attempts to build films around topical issues with "in your
face" solutions have failed in the past.  Somehow, director Shu Lea
Cheang pulls it off with enviable finesse.  The film is very
low-budget, but Cheang leverages that effectively by deliberately using
cheap, satirical sets and art direction.  With highly "affordable"
hardware (wire cable spools with shallow water filled aquariums fitted
with fluorescent tubes) she creates just the right atmosphere in the
chi chi toxic cafe.  A hodge podge of thrift store items look like the
kooky wardrobe these characters might actually wear in real life.  By
the way, a soundtrack should be made from Vernon Reid's compelling
score.
     The film is riddled with cameos by performance art fixtures like
Ron Vawter, Karen Finley, Laurie Carlos and Robbie McCauley.  NY's
"Angels in America" director George C. Wolfe appears on one news
segment as a distraught cat owner.  (By the way, there are a couple of
hilarious animated TV commercials, the "Eco Catfood" segment has to be
seen to be believed.)  The cast leads, filled with unknowns, are
talented and sufficiently appealing to hold your attention throughout
the endless antics.
     The script is more than a bit disjointed, and through the first
reel it's an effort to keep track of the large cast and their myriad
connections with one another.  But the film has many memorable,
compelling images, and far more "moments" than the average Hollywood
fare offers today.  I suspect that Cheang is a far better director than
screenwriter.  Coupled with the right author, her possibolities are
endless.
     Definitely worth seeing, (though not a "must see").  Look for it
to resurface in SF Bay area at the Roxie or the Red Vic.  A probable
future offering in the Facets video catalog, or maybe on cable's "USA
Up All Night."
     In the director's talk, Cheang revealed that "Kill" means stream
in Dutch.  She hoped to show how, globally speaking, we can't soil our
own nest.  What we put out, even on Orchid Island, eventually comes
back to us.  Cheang is a feisty, diminutive Chinese woman, with a
fabulous "dykes on bikes" haircut.  She unapologetically approached
very conservative foundations for grant money and funding (including
the spineless NEA) and managed to get it without question!  They funded
the project, even after having read the script, including Lesbian love
scenes.  (Maybe we should send her to PBS headquarters, where they just
wet their pants over filming the sequel to "Tales of the City.")  Cheang
is living proof that many times, the best "man" for the job is a
woman.

Title
Review for Glocken aus der Tiefe (1993)
Seen: Fri 5/7/93, Camera 3 San Jose, SF Film Festival
Rating: 10 (scale of 1->10)
     There were no program notes on this late entry at the festival,
and it was too dark in the theatre to capture the rushing credits.  In
a nutshell, Herzog sets his camera running with beautiful backdrops
throughout Russia.  He places various peasants and country folk who
speak directly to the lens about their religion/faith/superstitions.
It's fascinating viewing.  This would be the equivalent to letting the
camera roll in the backwoods of America to let snake handlers and holy
rollers tell their view of reality.
     Near Mongolia, we see the "Yulas," tribes who make strange, deep
frog-like croakings to reach a meditative state.  View old people on
their hands and knees crawling around Lake Kitesh, where they believe
there is an enchanted city with angels at the bottom.  More chilling is
the image of the faithful crawling out "on thin ice" as far as they can
to "view" the city below them.  As they do, you hear the eerie tearing
noises of cracking ice.
     A believable "Rasputin" (redeemer) makes frequent appearances and
comments, with a DaVinci like river background.  You hear him speaking
in endless New Testiment-like platitudes reminiscent of Elizabeth
Claire Prophet.  (In light of the recent Waco faithful-fry, it's
sometimes chilling.)  In the director's Q/A afterward, Herzog revealed
at the time of the filming last year there were about a hundred
"Rasputins" claiming to be Jesus returned.  Now the number is closer to
three hundred.  This s a normal phenomenon that occurs whenever Russia
is in a state of crisis and the faithful have trouble coping with a
changing world.
     Although you try not to snicker, some of the images approach Monty
Python humor; like the "grand sorcerer of Russia" who tries a mass
exorcism of a dozen highly spiritied "possessed" women on a high school
gymnasium stage.  Herzog takes a similar tack to LESSONS OF DARKNESS
where there is no narration to add judgement or a spin to what you are
viewing.  To an American audience, conditioned by CNN sound bites and
news images that resemble action sequences from a Bruce Willis trailer,
it's remarkably refreshing to have an extended view of a phenomenon and
be forced to draw your own reaction, without help.
     Very striking photography, and a lean but touching score.

Title
Review for One Foot On a Banana Peel, the Other Foot in the Grave (1993)
Scale 0-10 (10 = highest): doesn't apply
     Seldom does a film so effect you, through its naked self-honesty,
that the audience's urban cocoon of indifference and separation is
completely stripped away...  With ONE FOOT, it was to the point that
after viewing the film in the Kabuki's coffee bar, I had three total
strangers come up separately and say, "Excuse me, but I saw you in the
audience, can I join you and talk about that film?  I can't go home ...
not just yet...."
     Each member of the audience briefly reached the point of unafraid
self-revelation that had filled the screen for 85 minutes.  There is no
rating or recommendation that is worthy of this work.  Each viewer will
have his or her own unforgettable connection with the cast, and the
creators.
     In 1992, Juan Botas related to friends Jonathan Demme and Joanne
Howard his experiences (mostly life affirming) of his daily visits to
the "Dolly Madison" room of a Greenwich Village clinic (where he was
receiving IV medication to battle AIDS.)  At Demme's prompting, Botas
purchased a Hi-8 video camera ... and recorded his daily ordeal, with
himself on camera as well.  Demme's involvement as producer in this
project should more than make up for any resentment over his tepid
treatment of a gay relationship in PHILADELPHIA.  ONE FOOT completely
collapses the distance between any viewer and this pandemic by
revealing the patients' humanity to such an extent that unwelcomed
self-recognition will descend over many a viewer.  If silence equals
death, this film is about as far from silence as you can get!
     Botas was a gifted visual artist.  Victoria Leacock's camera often
captures close-ups of him creating Matisse like pastels while waiting
for his treatment to end.  With over half a dozen fellow patients and
the doctor's staff, an intimate and life-affirming extended family is
revealed.  These are men who have nothing left to lose, and no motive
for censoring their speech or opinions.  Nakedly honest assessments of
ex-wives, family and children (some of whom refuse to see them) are
shared with the camera and the audience.  Frustration over family
denial that refuses to let them make their wishes known for proper
burial or estate settlement are revealed.  Thru it all, again and again
we see needles being painfully injected into arms ... arms where
virtually all of the veins have collapsed.
     All action takes place in a single room, with sparse color (a
veridian green chair, variously colored T-shirts) that often resembles
the simple sketches Botas is working on.  Amazingly, the visuals and
content are never monotonous.  A simple, original score of guitar music
is progressively simplified, until by the film's end ... only one
string is plucked at a time, (underscoring the peeling away of physical
resources experienced by the patients.)  Lucas Platt revealed (in his
post-screening talk) that he had over 140 hours of video to edit, and a
three-week deadline for the world premiere of a rough cut, (held at a
Festival in Spain last year.)  It was possibly that frantic deadline
that forced him to instinctively select the most cogent sequences ...
resulting in a perfectly balanced, simple portrait of love, laughter,
survival, triumph of the human spirit, and utter pain and desolation.
     Half way through the project, Juan Botas dies.  The camera
unblinkingly records it all: his last visit to the room, when his fevers
have gotten worse and he is forced to confront his own imminent
mortality; the speculation amongst his friends while he's in the
hospital; finally, the naked grief they share on the day of his death.
That is, perhaps, the film's greatest gift: it completely strips away
whatever distance you have managed to construct between yourself and
AIDS.  A recent survey revealed that 56% of Americans claim they don't
"know" anyone who is gay.  With this film, you get to know the patients
more than you might want to ... and there are many moments of stark
self-recognition (including internalized homophobia and shame over
AIDS) that you might not want to recognize.
     Self-described as "healthy and heterosexual," Lucas Platt
completed the project for the deceased Botas.  Footage was shot over a
13-month period.  Platt confessed that he was plagued with self doubt
about being able to do the men justice, about being able to capture
their stories the way that Juan would have. "Doing this project has
forever changed my life," Platt confessed in an emotion-choked voice,
"the greatest compliment I got was from the clinic's administrator,
Gene Fedorkov, who phoned me after seeing it, and said, 'I didn't think
you'd understand us enough to be able to do this ... you proved me
wrong ... and I love you for that.'"  Platt continued, "I don't know what
my next project will be, but I wouldn't hesitate for a moment to do
another film about AIDS .... even if it typecasts me."
     One of the film's most unforgettable sequences is as a Canadian
patient describes the agonizing deterioration his lover when through
before his death.  "I had to beg his family to attend his funeral ... I
had to beg for his ashes ... after all of that love ... to be treated
like ... nothing!"  He collapses into dry, heaving sobs.  The black
orderly, Tyrone, kisses him on the head, kneels and holds him, with all
the majesty of a classic piece of sculpture.  The unmoving camera
records this sequence, with no music for a full two minutes.  Though it
is painfully obvious that the two men have forgotten the camera is
there ... it is a soaring and searing visual image.
     Amazingly, overall the film isn't depressing or a "downer."  It
is full of wonderful, camp, black humor.  (At one point two patients
discussing their inability to find someone to sign a living will ...
laughingly speculate on signing for each other.)  The film is very life
affirming in the naked honesty, shared unhesitatingly, by real people.
By the time of the film's premiere, nearly half the patients had died.
Botas's project records the staggeringly loss of talent and humanity
that AIDS has wrecked upon our society in a highly personal scale.  ONE
FOOT will reveal a lot about yourself, as whatever you have placed
between yourself and the plague, (denial, "I didn't know any of them")
is removed.

Title
Review for Cronos (1993)
Seen 5/2/95 Kabuki Theatre, SF (SF Film Festival) 
Director/Screenplay: Guillermo del Toro 
Producers: Bertha Navarro, Arthur Gorson
Camera: Guillermo Navarro 
Editor: Raul Davalos
Cast: Federico Luppi, Ron Perlman, Claudio Brook, Margarita Isabel, Tamara 
Shanath
Distribution: October Films (address/phone at end)
     Every so often, about once a year, you stumble upon a quirky film
that is so suffused with humanity, that so touches you in a unique and
tender way, that you forget all the turkeys you've sat through for the
past year ... that you almost turn religious thanking God for the
privilege of being a movie goer.  It is what film festivals were made
for.  For me, in 1993, it was TANGO ARGENTINO.  This year's find is
CRONOS.
     This jewel of a film defies classification: almost even balance
between an effective, low-budget horror flick, Hitchcock suspense, and
a touching, personal family drama.  It's an amazing debut for director
Guillermo del Toro (who also wrote the taut screenplay).  Guillermo
Navarro's honey-toned camera virtually hides all signs of the limited
budget, and the inspired casting makes this film a gift.  A world of
choices must have been rejected by the deft art director.  With an
alchemist's touch, director del Toro has turned something as hoary as a
vampire tale into solid gold.
     Sadly (see interview with director at end, which contain
plot-spoilers), over twenty minutes of the film was lost, due to a
flawed lens, so there are times that the story line is a bit abrupt.
If the lost footage had survived, this may have been another SHOP ON
MAINSTREET.  What survived from this single camera shoot comes damn
close to that treasure of a film.
     THE PLOT: a fast paced prologue reveals that an alchemist fled the
Spanish Inquisition to Colonial Mexico, while working on the secret of
eternal life through a timepiece of sorts (the Cronos, which resembles
a Faberge Easter Egg, "with a twist.").  A collapsed ceiling in the
1930's sends a sliver of wood and plaster through his heart, calling it
"curtains" for the 500-year-old vampire/alchemist.  Narration assures
us that though every item of the alchemist's estate was catalogued and
auctioned, the Cronos device was never found.  The camera makes a brief
sweep of what might have been Jeffrey Dahmler's kitchen.
     Fast forward to 1997, where the impish director/screenwriter gives
us a wry view of post NAFTA Mexico: signs in English/Spanish/Russian/
Japanese and Chinese fortune cookies being served as part of the
Christmas festivities.  English freely intermixed with Spanish
dialogue.
     Jesus Gris and his eight-year-old granddaughter, Aurora, have a
suspicious visitor to his antique shop.  The stranger is overly
interested in a Colonial archangel (which we've earlier seen in the
alchemist's Colonial laboratory).  The visitor, who was obviously casing
the joint, leaves without a purchase.  Curiosity piqued, Jesus pries
open the base, and discovers the alchemists secret Cronos-device.  His
curiosity sets the device in motion, and it literally gets its
"clutches" in him (shades of ALIEN!) altering the course of his life ...
forever.  Soon it's revealed that a wealthy, cancer-ridden villain,
who has the alchemist's instruction manual, but not the Cronos-device,
catches on to Jesus's "secret."  But the screenplay departs from all of
the usual plot turns one is accustomed to in a mainstream Hollywood
potboiler with a heavy dose of "chase" at it's core.
     Inspired casting includes Ron Perlman (THE NAME OF THE ROSE),
very recognizable as Linda Hamilton's "Beast" from the pre-Disney TV
series.  He plays an overgrown dufus, nephew to the eternity-obsessed
villain.  His obsession with an upcoming nose job, and nauseating
personal habits that literally defy description, provide steady comic
relief.
     But it is the enchanting combination of Argentinian actor Federico
Luppi as the grandfather, and Tamara Shanath as his hauntingly
beautiful, mute granddaughter, which elevates this film above the pale
of similar films about the "undead." Some of the lost footage (see
below) explained their deep connection, but the silent looks they
exchange in the surviving footage convey world's of meaning.  You may
find yourself holding your breath involuntarily at several points
throughout the film.  Ultimately, this grandfather literally goes to
hell and back, as a price for his curiosity, becoming a Christ-like
figure who must choose between eternal life and sacrifice for the one
he loves most.
     Incidentally, del Toro wrote his screenplay with Argentinian
actor, Federico Luppi, in mind.  Due to del Toro's youthful appearance,
Luppi thought he was a delivery boy when he showed up on his doorstep
with the script.  Luppi dismissed del Toro as an arrogant young pup,
when the hopeful director said, "I'd like to discuss this with you once
you've read it."  Luppi's world-class performance may inspire you to
reach for those Berlitz Spanish tapes you put on the back burner, in
order to more fully appreciate his earlier films in their original
tongue.
     The film contains grisly, explicit violence, which often comes off
amazingly inoffensive, when balanced with the rest of the film.  The
director treads a very thin line at times, between classic Alfred
Hitchcock suspense and John Waters high camp, black humor.  It is a
line that has tripped more experienced talent (Peter Bogdonovich and
Mel Brooks numerous times).  Del Toro might be a candidate for Cirque
du Soleil for succeeding in his amazing balancing act.  The inspired
musical score has a lot to do with the successful weight of the film.
(Please, God, let there be a soundtrack!  It's in Dolby.)
     Another unique aspect of this film is its almost 50/50 balance
between English dialogue and subtitled Spanish.  The American
characters understand everything that is said to them in Spanish, yet
stubbornly answer in English.  (How like the first Anglo arrivals to
California.)  As a result, the experience doesn't have the "feel" of a
foreign language film.
     Director del Toro confessed to combining two obsessions in his
screenplay;  his fascination with insects (there is a live one at the
heart of the Cronos device) and what he sees as the "synergy" between
vampirism and Latino Catholicism. "I always thought of the host and
communion as Christian Sushi," he joked, in heavily accented English,
"as a child I wondered how they preserved that body of Christ for such
a long time, to still be eating it in church!"
     "My grandmother was so religious," continued the boyish,
anglo-looking director, "that by age 11 I was the official spokesperson
for the Virgin Mary."  What del Toro described as the unbalanced
emphasis on damnation over redemption in his local church obviously had
a heavy hand in some of the haunting makeup and imagery chosen for the
film.
     Deliberate parallels to the life of Christ and insects were
sprinkled throughout the screenplay.  The grandfather, who
eventually/temporarily "dies," resurrects on the third day.  One
character comments that God may have loved insects most of all,
"mosquitos walk on water ...  Jesus walks on water."  There are several
plot references to insects being "perfect machines," while the man-made
machine (Cronos) runs awry in the havoc it wrecks on the main
characters.
THE LOST FILM REELS:
     Due to the low budget, footage was shot in Mexico, and processed
in Los Angeles.  "We had weeklies, not dailies," del Toro commented.
Tragically, over a week's worth of shooting was lost due to a flawed,
out of focus lens.  Budget and schedule  didn't permit any retakes.
     WHAT WAS LOST: the original screenplay revealed that young Aurora
retreated into a mute fantasy world after her parents left, never to
return.  She is being raised by Jesus, her grandfather, and his wife,
who teaches Tango lessons.  A lost scene showed Jesus lovingly writing
fake post cards to Aurora from her dead parents.  The fact that she
accepts this fantasy of distant, yet loving parents, makes her
non-chalant reaction to her grandfather's predicament (she's the only
witness) ring true.
     In a brief, touching scene that survives, we see the resurrected
and deteriorating Jesus painfully writing a love letter to his grieving
"widow," trying to explain why he can't permit her to see him.  In a
lost, succeeding sequence, Jesus then silently slipped into his wife's
bedroom, where he tenderly placed his note in her sleeping hand.  He
falls asleep, unnoticed, next to her, until dawn, when he must leave
(having become a vampire).
     On waking, the "widow" can't believe the note she finds, and
logically assumes that mute Aurora has written it. "What do you think
this is, another one of your crazy postcards?" she screams, tossing the
family secret out into the open.  According to del Torro, the look on
young Aurora's face, in the badly fogged footage, was unforgettable.
     The surviving footage has a rather abrupt jump, early in the film,
to the rejuvenated grandfather (after his first dose of Cronos) finding
that his antique shop had been trashed.  Lost in the fogged footage is
what sounds like a wonderful scene, where the night before, he
rediscovers his lost virility.  He tries to romance his wife, only to
be rejected, because she's too tired from her Tango lessons to realize
what she's missing.  This lost scene makes her later refusal to believe
or accept his painful post-mortem note even more touching.  What does
survive, is an unforgettable image of the resurrected grandfather,
fresh from the mortuary, calling his wife from a pay phone in the
pouring rain, only to have her hang up on him (because it obviously
must be a "crank" call).
     The film was shot on a budget of $1.2 million, which actually cost
over $2 million American due to the 30% Mexican interest loans.  It was
completed on a frantic eight-week schedule.  Though we'll never know
exactly how great the film might have been with the lost footage, we
can celebrate having found a new director who may be just the one to
shed light on the newly changed relationship between America and
Mexico.  By any measure or scale, CRONOS is an amazingly brilliant
first effort.
     Fortunately, this film has distribution.  Run, don't walk to your
nearest repertory film house and direct them to:

Title
Review for Abyss, The (1989)
     The long-awaited release of the Special Edition laserdisc sets of
James Cameron's 1989 film THE ABYSS has finally happened, and for once
all the anticipation has been worth it.  This review attempts to cover
the different aspects of this landmark release in a half-critical,
half-informational light, and though some things here have been noted
by others on rec.video.releases, I'm putting my two cents' worth in
anyway :-)
OVERVIEW
~~~~~~~
     THE ABYSS: SPECIAL EDITION comprises an extended version of the
1989 film, containing, by the director's count, twenty-eight minutes of
new footage and three minutes of expanded credits.  The total running
time of the feature film is 171 minutes versus the original version's
140.  This release is available in either an original aspect ratio
"letterbox" version at 2.2:1 aspect ratio, or a "Director's Pan And
Scan" version presented full-frame.  The set also includes an extensive
supplement disc containing a new one hour documentary about the making
of the film, and an exhaustive CAV supplement containing a wealth of
information about the production.  The release is the first to be
mastered to the new THX LaserDisc standard.  Also included is a colour
tri-fold brochure containing full restoration notes and a short essay
by Cameron about the restoration and his views on the Widescreen Vs
Pan-and-scan debate.  The recommended retail price in the US is $99.95,
and as this reviewer lives in Australia, the set cost $190 in
Australian currency, or about US$140.  The version reviewed is the
Widescreen edition.
THE FILM
~~~~~~~
     I should point out first and foremost that I am an unashamed fan
of this film, not only for its incredible visuals but also for the two
amazing performances put in by Ed Harris and Mary Elizabeth
Mastrantonio, and Cameron's naively romantic script.  So watching an
expanded "Special Edition" of the film I have grown to count as one of
my favorites was a strange experience.  The trouble with being so
familiar with the pace and structure of a film is that when scenes are
added, there's the possibility that they may jar with what is expected
and take the viewer out of the world of the film for an instant as they
notice, "hey, that's new" and often give a small restored scene more
attention than it should be given in the context of the film.
     The restored scenes are many and varied, the longest sequences
appearing at the film's climax, when the legendary wave sequence
finally makes its appearance.  But the scenes added earlier are of a
far more personal nature; the relationship between Bud and Lindsey is
far more clearly defined and coloured, as is that of the crew amongst
each other.  I could have done without the "camaraderie" shot of One
Night and the gang all singing along to Linda Ronstadt as they tow
their rig along the ocean floor, but hey, Jim's always had a redneck
streak appear somewhere in his movies.  Hell, the man was a trucker
once, after all :-)
     Technically the inserts vary.  Most of the cast returned for
additional ADR and the one notable exception, as throughout the whole
three discs, was Mastrantonio.  Her dialogue has been restored from
secondary audio sources, easily identifiable due to the mains hum and
hiss in the background.  Visually a few of the new scenes are
noticeable immediately due to the shift in colour balance and less
careful negative storage procedures, and there's an editing mark or two
visible in there.  Having said that, the new shots still look fine, and
the added footage for the Wave sequence and Bud's extra dialogue with
the NTIs looks sharp, crisp, and perfect.
     A curious thing is Cameron's assertion that in the release version
of the film, he ran the end credits in tiny text lightning-fast to save
time, and that he has now re-shot them with new info, bigger text and a
slower crawl.  Certainly, if you check the VHS release of the film,
there are those pesky fast credits.  But on the original LD of the
original cut of the film, the credits had been mysteriously
re-composited and slowed down, making them slow, big, and legible.
They ran for exactly 9.5 minutes.  The new credits run for slightly
less than that, and faster!  So why did Cameron have to re-score the end
credits using some of Robert Garrett's music, when a full 9.5 minute
Alan Silvestri end credit score was available?  Hmmm....
     All in all, and as Cameron himself says, this is in some ways a
very different film to the original release.  The mood of the film has
noticeably changed, and there's more *character* in the characters.
I'll reserve judgement until I've seen it a few more times, but I like
the way it's turned out.  A lot.
THE DOCUMENTARY
~~~~~~~~~~~~~~
     Titled "Under Pressure: Making The Abyss" this one-hour
presentation, completed in 1993 by Ed Marsh, is entertaining,
informative, and thankfully almost hype-free.  It contains contemporary
interviews with the cast who retuned for new ADR (sorry, Mastrantonio
isn't interviewed) and old ones shot by Fox's promo crew back in 88/89
(strangely, not one word from Mary here either, unfortunately).
There's a wealth of behind-the-scenes footage, some humour, Gale Anne
Hurd and Jim Cameron in separate rooms, anecdotes, drama, and a truly
massive water-filled nuclear reactor.  If you like the film, you'll
find this fascinating.  As you also will if you don't.  However good
the documentary is, though, in matters of pure information it pales in
comparison to...
THE SUPPLEMENT
~~~~~~~~~~~~~
     A 23-minute CAV side packed to the rafters with everything you
could possibly want to know about the film and its production.  There's
a complete early script treatment, the complete final shooting script,
the full storyboard collection, detailed info on the creation of the
individual effects including copious stills and raw video footage,
costume design info and stills, casting, Cameron's actual epic memo to
SFX houses saying what he wants and how he wants it, and more.
Sequences such as the pseudopod scene are explained from conception to
execution; there are loads more archival photos of the cast, posters,
the old LD sleeve (!), crew t-shirts, promotional stuff, restoration
info; there are three trailers including Ed Marsh's terrific theatrical
trailer which was never seen outside the US.
     This, simply, is unbelievable--there's enough here to fill a
large glossy colour book, and it's only after viewing this supplement
that you'll really realise how much of a bargain the set is.  I have
spent a good hour reading over it thoroughly and still haven't seen
a quarter of it in detail.  Unprecedented access to materials has
helped of course, and the closet in these terms seen before this would
be Terry Gilliam's "Fisher King" supplement--in terms of co-operation,
not content.  This supplement out-contents them all.  Period.
DISC TECHNICAL
~~~~~~~~~~~~~
     The only word that can be used is PHENOMENAL.  For starters, I
don't know which Japanese plant Fox got these discs manufactured at,
but these three platters are the cleanest, most dropout-free discs I
have ever seen.  Then there's the mastering.  A D1/D2 digital video
transfer, the image has been immeasurably aided by the THX program,
which as it turns out is essentially a reference test signal inserted
in the vertical blanking interval at the telecine stage and referenced
during all stages of mastering, the image quality surpasses just about
any other disc I've seen.  I compared this with the original Fox LD of
the film, and the difference is astounding.  The original, which I'd
always considered to look fairly good, is in comparison with the new
disc grainy, contrasty and lacks definition.  I recorded a section of
the new disc onto VHS tape and played it back whole a/B comparing with
the old disc.  Guess which looked better?  Yep, the *tape*!  This new
transfer from interpositives struck from the origianl negatives,
conveys more detail, colour, and outright resolution than the
original.  The transfer was, according to the packaging, supervised by
Cameron, and the restoration, unlike the "Aliens" Special Edition, was
completed not on videotape but on film.
     The wide-screen edition is letterboxed at 2.2:1, which is probably
as close as we're ever going to get to the original theatrical 2.35:1
aspect ratio (I finally had the theater aspect confirmed by a friend
who's actually projected the thing!).  The original version of the film
on LD was presented at 1.85:1, and A/B comparison reveals some extra
image, usually, strangely enough, at the bottom of the frame, and some
side information missing.
     Cameron's philosophy on Super 35mm -> anamorphic presentation is
(and this is even noted in his notes to the SFX crew before production
began, as seen on the supplement side) "You get *more* on the
pan-and-scan version than you did in the cinema".  Look Jim, if that's
so desirable, why not just present the thing in Academy ratio to begin
with?  The wide-screen edition contains the film as seen in the cinema,
and if you're used to letterboxing already you won't have it any other
way.  Cameron's worries about the resolution of NTSC video have been
offset by the wonders the THX mastering process has done for the
image.
     Sound is superb, mastered with dynamic range to spare--and it's
used--with the exception of the final credit music, which has
obviously suffered master tape damage, as dropouts of the analogue
variety that don't appear on the original film's soundtrack are
present.
     And the THX chord is there at the start of the disc, sounding
amazing but regrettably shortened for video, missing out on the
surround channel effects that accompany the "Audience Is Listening"
text in the cinema.
     Side changes are well-placed at the end of key sections of the
story, and notably the film has been spread over four sides despite the
fact that it would have fit on three.  The last side is CAV, and it
includes the wave sequence.
     The discs are well-packaged in plastic-lined paper sleeves sitting
in a perfectly-sized box that doesn't allow the disks to move around
when closed.
SUMMARY
~~~~~~
     A bargain, if you love the film.  Still worthwhile if you have an
interest in the technology of film-making and/or presentation.  Fox
have outdone themselves here, and presented a worthy opening salvo for
the THX disc program to boot.  Lets hope this technology filters down
from collector's sets to standard LD releases--as in time it no doubt
will.
     But what could simply have been a very good LD edition of the film
turns out to be beyond anyone's wildest dreams--the correct aspect
ratio, the startling image and sound quality, and the comprehensive
supplement make this set not only a benchmark for future reference and
a stunning showpiece for your home theater, but also the entire "Abyss"
story and the film itself, all wrapped up in a neat box.
Congratulations, James Cameron, Van Ling and crew, and Fox.  You've come
up with a masterpiece.


Title
Review for Posse (1993)
IN A NUTSHELL: If you're like me and *hate* westerns, give this one a
chance.  The mostly black cast is makes for a more historically accurate
view of the Old West than the white-bread Hollywood myopia we're
accustomed to (8,000 cowboys, a third of the lot, were black!!)  Strong
direction, a cast that "clicks" and effective use of "post office
mural" style cinematography.  Flawed slightly by overuse of flashbacks,
and heavy leaning on "eye for an eye" justice.  *Very* violent, but
forgivable.  An appealing sex scene with the same level of explicitness
as most Mel Gibson films.
     This film held my interest from start to finish.  Like many who
remember their first westerns in the age of above ground nuclear
testing, I've never been able to take this format seriously.  We never
saw 5 o'clock shadow on our heros, until the arrival of the spaghetti
westerns in the 60's.  But the faces were still white, and Indians were
usually played by well-tanned Italian actors.  Add to the mix the
mandatory love interest, who'd made it across the plains with her
lipstick and virtue intact.
     Van Pebbles sets the record straight, with a more realistic "color
palette." There were lots of blacks in the old west, including about a
third of the original settlers in Los Angeles.  Many were genuine heroes
who couldn't cross the color-line into an honest obituary or a place in
the history books.  Our Anglo-centric view has excluded blacks from most
American history, outside the Civil War.  A few low-budget "race" films
in the 30's portrayed black cowboys, but the runs were short and the
audiences segregated.  Placing this missing ingredient (black cowboys)
in center spot light makes a tired old format interesting for the first
time in recent memory.
     Van Peebles plays "Jesse Lee," a "buffalo soldier," conscripted
from prison for "life time military service."  (He's in prison for
having attempted to avenged the white-hate induced murder of his
father.)  The film opens with him at the center of the Spanish-American
war (where there were two major divisions of brothers, including an
all-black platoon who's heavy casualties made it safe for Teddy
Roosevelt to gallup up San Juan Hill).  Van Peebles lays it on pretty
thick with the totally despicable, pretty-boy racist captain, who
commands Jesse to murder a fellow soldier for his amusement.  (Though
this is no more exaggerated than elements in most westerns.)  Jesse
assembles a "posse" of fellow black (and one white, Baldwin) outlaws
to break free.  A skirmish leaves the villain shy one eye and with
enough motive to follow Jesse nearly to the ends of the earth, and the
utopian community founded by freed slaves that is Jesse's ultimate
destination.
     Though no Mahatma Gandhi, "Little J" (Baldwin) is remarkably
color-blind for his era, (the only color he sees is "green").  Van
Peebles resists the temptation to make Baldwin a white "Sydney
Poitier," and integrates him very well into the dynamics of the group.
Initially, baser motives (like cheating at gambling) are the unifying
force, but as the escape progresses the characters trust and know each
other on a deeper level, and the color issue gradually fades.
     Though much of the imagery deliberately harks to familiar
spaghetti westerns, Van Peebles makes a much more engaging and sexy
leading man than Clint Eastwood.  Jesse isn't  the totally remote,
unknowable stranger.  You get to know almost more than you want to
about him due to the sepia flashbacks that appear with the annoying
regularity of network TV commercials.  "Jesse's" lusty reunion with the
half Cherokee girlfriend he ditched covers the same amount of skin and
positions as THIEF OF HEARTS, but the darker skin tones nearly earned
the film a NC-17 rating.  The white men on the ratings board still
aren't comfortable viewing nude, black male flesh.
     The film *is* intensely violent, (about the same body count as any
Stephen Segal film) but I didn't find it particularly offensive.
(I've always thought of westerns as bowling tournaments with bodies
instead of pins.)  Be prepared for a few closeups of exactly how a
bullet passes through a face and more.  More troubling is Jesse's "eye
for an eye" approach to picking off everybody who ever did him wrong.
(You begin to wonder if there's anyone in that time zone who didn't
taunt him with flaming crosses, etc, due to the heavily populated
flashbacks.)  But westerns are never particularly realistic about cause
and effect (e.g., how many heroes walked into a hail of badly aimed
bullets, unscathed?)
     Van Peebles brings several interesting "new" elements to the
western format: the dynamics of authority and loyalty in the black
township are intriguing.  (E.g., do they kowtow to the white marshall,
or fight back for what is rightfully theirs?  Take a wild guess.)  The
dynamics between blacks and Indians, who found a lot of common ground
in the crumbs the white establishment approved for them.  A hero who
isn't particularly "mysterious" or tongue-tied on what his motives
are.  A cast who can act.  (This could be the vehicle to make Baldwin a
star.)  A mellow, rich palette for the camera.  (Van Peebles revealed in
the director's chat that he used low-arc lighting in most scenes, which
make both white and black skin look attractive.)  Clever use of humorous
anachronisms (e.g., the whiney barber exclaiming, "Can't we just all
get along?" during the Bonny and Clyde-like hail of bullets sprayed
against his shop).
     Van Peebles has just scratched the surface of unsung black history
of the Old West.  There appears to be enough pay dirt to warrant a lot
more films like this.  And who knows, if they make the violence a
little less like an anatomy class, and stretch out the skin scenes, I
just may learn to like westerns after all.
     Prediction: expect much of the establishment press to downplay
this film for (a) an unfair portrayal of unappetizing white characters
(b) too much violence and (c) explicit sex scenes.  None of these
points are true with this film.  If  any critics are uncomfortable with
the content of this film, they should blame our censored history text
books.

Title
Review for Fanci's Persuasion (1995)
     Touted as a chaotic fairy tale for the queer, urban world, FANCI'S
PERSUASION might more aptly be retitled GET OUT OF TOWN!  Because
that's exactly what you'd be doing if San Francisco even slightly
resembled the unwatchable mish mash captured by
Director/Writer/Producer Charles Herman-Wurmfeld.  If you're part of
the politically correct set that can't possibly criticize a queer film,
and just have to support it no matter what--my advice; go to this flick
stoned.
     The press kit claims this film celebrates the visual styles of
Pedro Almodovar and John Waters with a story loosely based on A
MIDSUMMER NIGHT'S DREAM.  The only thing missing is wit, humor and
talent.  As near as we can tell, a few cardboard cutouts of a
flamingos constitute the tribute to John Waters, and Almodovar is
honored with a few garishly painted walls in some Mission District
flats and intricate hair-dos.
     The film falls several yards short of being high camp enough to
entertain on an unintended level.  Frequent black-and-white dream
segments might have caused a few titters, if they weren't so damned
embarrassing.  Most of the performances invoke the same type of painful
embarrassment you feel for a neighbor's talentless child who's goaded
into an impromptu recital.
     Cinematographer David Rush Morrison spins gaudy images that
resemble a film student's homage to Andy Warhol.  However unsteadily the
camera may be held, it's an irresistible attraction for the actors, who
are more than just a little aware of its presence.
     Drag superstar Justin Bond is utterly wasted in the role of the
vicious mother to lesbian bride wanna-be, Fanci (Jessica Patton).  The
title character is surely the most annoying screen presence this side
of Pippi Longstocking.  Fanci's intended, Lorretta (Boa) is yet another
screen version of a black lesbian that can't let "butch" and talent
coexist in the same frame.
     The plot: A mysterious spell falls over San Francisco, causing
power outages, and unlikely sexual liaisons.  Will the marriage vows be
spoken? asks the press kit.  The answer is a resounding: who cares!
     A butt-numbing 80 minutes of incomprehensible sound and image can
be yours at San Francisco's Red Vic Theatre October 5 & 6.  FANCI'S
PERSUASION will crop up regularly at Midnight showings around the
country.

Title
Review for Tikhiye stranitsy (1993)
Viewered at San Francisco Film Festival, May 9, 1994
Rating: Scale 1-10 (10 = highest) 9
Must be viewed on large screen, video is inconceivable.
     A film I recommend with reservations: I was enthralled, but the
typical filmgoer, without advance warning or program notes, would find
this offering about as exciting as watching paint dry.  Sokurov has
created an almost wordless visual poem ... compelling, watery dream-like
images, with subliminal sounds of half-heard conversations and rushing
water leaking in.  Orthogonal camera distortion, murky still images,
matted backgrounds and miniatures create a world that taps heavily from
the universal race consciousness, a heavy dose of deja vu will set in
as you "remember" images that nearly every citizen of the western world
has experienced in universal dreams and nightmares.
     WHISPERING PAGES is based on "images" from 19th Century Russian
novels.  A scrap of plot, with nameless characters, involves a
Dostoyevski-esque tragic hero who's evidently murdered an old woman to
collect on her estate.  A waif-like heroine, reduced to prostitution,
is so ethereal that you suspect she may be a figment of his
imagination.
     The 77 minutes pass quite slowly, with some camera pans (e.g. from
the top to the bottom of a statue) taking nearly five minutes.  It's
not a bore, though.  The alert viewer will catch occasional freezes
into a still shot, and a watery drifting in and out of color.  The film
is a brilliant textbook on camera technique; required viewing for any
serious students of world cinema.  Your appreciation will increase if
you're also a fan of German Silent films.  Many of the overhead shots
of murky urban miniatures bear a startling resemblance to the workers
quarters in METROPOLIS.  At times the camera lens is so distorted that
the crooked alleyways resemble the twisted sets of CABINET OF DOCTOR
CALIGARI.  A bureaucrat who administers red-tape surrounding the old
woman's estate is identical to the police clerks in CALIGARI.  All
that's missing are the elevated desks and chairs.  Long shots of the
hero, in supplication in his cell-like apartment, chill the blood as
much as the infamous camera shot receding from the tragic Emil Jannings
in THE LAST LAUGH.
     WHISPERING PAGES, though, is far from being a silent film; the use
of sound is brilliant.  Through the film, there is the constant sound
of water; running through pipes, rushing by opaque windows, dripping.
You can almost "hear" the omnipresent vapors.  In a chalky image of
birds hovering above the river's surface, we hear the heart-like beat
of wings.
     The lead actor, Alexander Cherednik, is lanky, and very
Christ-like in appearance.  Unless you notice that his fingers have
mysteriously elongated, several encounters with a distortion lens
during his scenes may escape your notice.  This film has many searing
visual images, that match the greatest moments of German Silent Cinema;
for instance, when Cherednik awakens under the monstrous statue of a
lioness and sucks on her teat.  Camera pointed at ceiling, with
severely distorted lenses makes a four-story stairwell appear like
something from a medieval miniature; we see nameless characters
climbing over the rail, and plunging, in slow motion, into an abyss.
Doors open onto plunging shafts.  Exterior shots of tenements on the
river reveal ladders and stairs that end in mid-air.  Much of the
imagery is nightmarish and unforgettable.
     Experiencing the film is a bit like being in a convincing seance,
summoning up images from a the world of the dead.  You feel like a time
traveler, drifting, ghost-like, in the netherworlds of Russian poverty
sometime around the 1830s or 1840s.  You'll derive an almost
voyeuristic thrill in picking up snatches of conversation that you
weren't intended to hear.
     If this type of film or subject matter interests you at all, I
encourage you to alter your calendar to accommodate it's rare
showings.  Like the watery, ghost-like images it contains, sadly, this
film won't see the light of day for long in our channel-surfing world.
Ironically, unlike most current popular films, which evaporate from
your memory by the time you get to the parking lot.  WHISPERING PAGES
leaves indelible images floating before you vision upon waking the next
day.

Title
Review for Careful (1992)
Rating: 9 (on a scale of 1->10)
(I'd give it a 10, but it's very low-budget)
Seen: Mon Oct 11, 93, SF's Castro Theatre
Written and Directed by Guy Maddin
Cast: Kyle McCulloch, Gosia Dobrowolska, Sara Neville, Brent Neale,
      Paul Cox and Jackie Burroughs.
     The USA Film Festival described this as Twin Peaks directed by
Erich von Stroheim.  Not a bad description. It's an uproarious satire,
in the vein of YOUNG FRANKENSTEIN ... but the film often so
beautifully duplicates the material it parodies that your breath is
taken away. It's a little like reading a hysterical comic book, and
finding original paintings by old masters salted throughout!
     This brilliant Canadian film heavily borrows from the high-camp
expressionism of German silent films, especially the "mountain" films
of Leni Riefenstahl.  Anyone who's read FROM CALIGARI TO HITLER will
recognize dozens of scenes in this film as near carbons of stills from
the book. Perhaps more than any other films before or since, German
silent cinema created compelling images that tap into universal race
consciousness, portraying grainy, moving archetypal images all of us
vaguely recognize from dreams or nightmares. Because of this, CAREFUL
will often take your breath away with unexpected moments of quiet
majesty and beauty. But there are plenty of laughs in between, (with
"sick," 70's style National Lampoon-like humor). If you've never
laughed at seeing an eye poked out, leave political correctness at the
door and give this film a whirl!
     The soundtrack if often deliberately scratchy or muffled, and in
several scenes easter-egg like colors are used that resemble the early
two-strip technicolor process. Ominous title cards are used to
introduce scenes. This bizarre film is salted with unexpected dialogue
like this:
     BOY: "My, aren't you the frisky one today."
     GIRL: "Even the reindeer are such, when Spring is coming!"
     Enough of the aesthetics, what is the film supposedly about? The
action takes place in the 19th century alpine village of Tolzbad, that
is so precariously poised under constant threat of avalanche that
villagers have learned to communicate only in whispers. Animals have
had their vocal chords removed, and gramophones have lambs wool stuffed
in the horn.  Villagers keep time to the "sound" of silent instruments
at a "concert."  There are handful of soundproof ice caves where the
villagers can frolic and shout, letting out their pent up, pagan
passions. The film is clearly a biblical parable about repression.
Jackie Burroughs does a brilliant bit part as the puritanical teacher,
who closely resembles the Cloris Leachman role in YOUNG FRANKENSTEIN.
     All of the characters display a surface naivete; actresses speak
in the perky, breathless voices reminiscent of badly dubbed post-war
European B films, "strapping" young sons still wear short pants'd
school uniforms. The film quickly descends below the surface to show
the village as a cauldron of incestuous flirtations, violent
retaliation and explosive "family secrets."  The plot follows an arc of
forbidden loves and passions, leading to retribution on a biblical
scale. What may appear to the modern audience as "cheap" special
effects are actually loving recreations of how ghosts and visions were
portrayed in silent and early talking German films. Many of the images
are unforgettable, like the "trolley" cars pulled by oxen, or the mine
workers wearing crowns of flickering candles. Some closeups resemble
early Garbo or Dietrich films of the 30's.
     One of the most fascinating  and bizarre films you could see this
year, watch for it at your local Art/Repertory house. It demands
multiple viewings. Take a friend; this is definitely a film you'll want
to dissect over several capuccinos. Don't expect this film to come out
on video, considering its limited screenings.

Title
Review for Malcolm X (1992)
STRONG POINTS: brilliant direction, strong cast, tight script, the
story itself, art direction and cinematography.
COLD SPOTS: (minor complaint) a poorly placed musical soundtrack that
often distracts from critical dialogue.
     The incredible spiritual journey and transformation of Malcolm X
would make fascinating viewing, even if you rewrote the story and took
away the fact that he was Black, or that it took place in America.  His
message still applies to many situations beyond Blacks and racism,
(listen to his "house nigger" speech on TV in light of gays in the
closet, or women and the "glass ceiling" in corporate America!)  Latent
racism has crept into most mainstream reviews, and many white critics
are threatened by this film because:
--      he found genuine redemption and salvation without Jesus
     Director Spike Lee avoids most of the pitfalls common to
biographies or historic epics, be they docu-dramas (JFK) or episodic
(GANDHI).  Spike doesn't over dwell on childhood flashbacks to "explain"
the adult character's motives, he doesn't attempt to reconstruct well
remembered historical encounters that clone newspaper photos.  And most
importantly, he *never* loses sight of his character's humanity or
dignity in favor of the "sweep" of history.
     A ground breaking first for American films *and* Lee, is that he
allows the main character's spouse to remain a significant presence and
influence throughout the film.  Typical Hollywood treatment would have
allowed Malcolm about five minutes for a "love story," we'd see his wife
again when she gives birth to their first child, she'd walk in the room
and place her hand on his shoulder saying something significant after a
threatening phone call, and then she'd show up again for the deathbed
scene!
     Instead, Malcolm's wife walks into camera range, and STAYS there as
a significant and compelling presence through the second half of the
film.  Her keening widow's wail at the end of the film will stick with
you for hours if not days after the film ends.  Spike never loses sight
of any of his character's humanity of dignity.  You will experience
their losses on a very visceral level.
     The film and story certainly have a grand sense of history,
(especially for any of us old enough to remember the latter years of
Malcom X).  But the characters don't turn into plaster saints or
pseudo-biblical prophets.  Contrary to what you may hear in some reviews
or commentaries, Spike Lee *does not* stoop to his own brand of racism
by painting all the white characters as "devils" or whatnot.  The
attitudes shown by the whites in Malcolm's life are a brutally honest
reflection of America at that time.  The death of Martin Luther King
gave many Americans the same kind of myopia about the late 60's that
JFK's death created over his lack of ability as a president.  Spike
throws a little Windex on the lens of our collective memories and shows
it like it was/still is ... warts and all.  Which is why many older
viewers will be offended by what they'd prefer to forget.
     I'm going to skip over comments on actor's and performances--they
are *all* brilliant.  Most magazine reviews have singled out Denzel
Washington as Malcolm, and rated the film weak overall, with comments
like Spike is out of his element in a sweeping historical film of this
scope.  NOT!  Although he'll probably get passed over at the Academy
Awards, Spike has essentially *reinvented* a nearly dead art form.  The
lion's share of credit goes to the dedication and courage of this one
man who successfully fought to bring his vision, intact (in all of its
3.5 hours of glory), to the screen.
     Frequently, in powerfully emotional scenes with Malcolm X behind a
podium, Lee gently tones down Denzel's performance to ensure that we
really listen to the words of one of the greatest Americans that ever
lived.  This film will send millions of young blacks and whites to their
nearest library or bookstore to find out more.  If this film
accomplishes nothing more than that, it will go down in history as one
of the most significant films of the last quarter of this century.

Title
Review for Rift (1993)
Premiere Jan 23 at Sundance Film Festival, UT
     This film was so bad, it may end up being my "guilty treat" for
this year.  (Last year was the video rental gem, LADY TERMINATOR.)
     Director Barkin based the film on his play of the same name.  It
revolves around a neurotic NYC love triangle, with three of the shallowest
characters you've encountered on film.  The "20-something" cast look
like models from a Newport cigarette ad, especially the smoky hunk,
Timothy Cavanagh, who plays the domineering husband who slowly sinks
into the bottle, (but somehow manages to maintain those abs and
perfectly spiked hair in the process.)
     The dramatic tension is supposed to rest on the fact that "Tom"
(William Sage), best friend to Bill (Cavanagh) and Lisa (Bransford)
might be slowly losing his mind.  The tenuous grip on his sanity is
portrayed by a seemingly endless replay of a "nightmare" sequence that
looks like out takes from a rejected HBO "Tales from the Crypt" episode.
The director missed an opportunity when he chose to put wan, thin-lipped
Wm. Sage in all the sweaty near nude nightmare sequences, and leaves
the hunkier Cavanagh fully clothed in nearly every scene.  The nightmare
always ends with Bill getting ready to kill Tom because he's been
fooling around with his wife, Lisa.  Imagine Tom's fragile sanity when
he discovers that Bill and Lisa's marriage is crumbling, and that Lisa
just "might" be falling for him.
     The corn really gets piled on when Lisa convinces Tom to start
seeing a psychiatrist, Joe Isuzu look-alike Alan Davidson.  The shrink
starts showing up, not only in Tom's dreams, but in bar mirrors, on his
TV ... anywhere there's a glass surface.  His mugging face is about as
obnoxious as the starched braids of Pippy Longstocking ... and a gradual
wave of titters start developing in the audience with each appearance.
     The cast is lightweight, and collectively have the talent clout of
a minor role supporting daytime soap opera star.  The actors are
obviously used to getting audience reaction from some SoHo or Village
crowd with gymnastic eyebrows and great hair.  Ms.  Bransford "changes
character" via a variety of head bands and home shopping club jewelry.
(She's a rich girl from Park Avenue, Tom and Bill are best buddies from
Queens.)  The guys are about as "yo boy" as Rob Lowe, and Lisa has all
the nascent social grace of a Mary Kay hostess.
     Although I wouldn't recommend this film to anyone, I found
enjoyment in counting the number of ways they blew it.  (a) In a tender
and emotional scene where Lisa "comforts" the terrified Tom, you start
to notice how much lacquer they put in his hair to keep that one strand
dangling precariously over his brow.  (b) In a "let's watch their love
grow" sequence of youthful antics and dorky music in a carnival, you
start counting the times that Lisa's hair doesn't match in retakes, or
how her shoes don't match her hand bag.  In summary, you pass your time
with this film pretty much the way you kill a dreary cross-country
flight in economy ... by people watching, and looking for pathetic
little details.  Unfortunately, with this film, you don't get the
peanuts and a Coke.  A thorough reading of those Nordic Ski-Trac ads
would be a welcomed relief.

Title
Review for Man to Man (1992)
IN A NUTSHELL: an extraordinary creation by Director John Maybury, with
a towering performance by the unstoppable Tilda Swinton.  Based on a
true story of a woman who crossed the gender line and lived as a man in
Nazi Germany.  The film offers an entrancing world of composite images,
the hypnotic canvas of Tilda Swinton's face, and an intense look into
the best and worst of human survival.
     Imagine that it's 1930, and you're the first amongst your friends
to see THE BLUE ANGEL with Marlene Dietrich.  Then you're told it may
not be shown again!  That's the unthinkable situation for this
brilliant new offering from John Maybury.  About 60 thousand pounds is
needed to transfer the film from video to 35mm, and a distributor must
be found.  (Information on where to send your donations/inquiries at
end of review.)  I spoke with the Director, and there are currently no
more scheduled viewings.  If you want to see this film, dig, and dig
deep.  As Aimee Semple McPherson said when passing her collection
plate, "I don't want to hear any of that metal sound; let's make it
paper, please."
     ABOUT THE FILM: my description will fall short of matching the
film's genius, so keep an open mind.  It is a tour d' force, one-woman
show, based on the true story of a woman who assumed her dead husband's
identity to avoid destitution.  (This was not an isolated case, and in
other festival showings, the director has encountered evidence of about
a dozen similar cases.)  From this vantage point comes a view of fear,
power and regret that is only possible when gender is hidden.  Rather
than being a specific glimpse of Nazi Germany preserved in amber, the
film rises to a higher level, and is universal in scope and relevance.
     This film is a visceral portrayal of exactly what it's like to
stifle who and what you really are.  As such, the film's essence is
immediately recognizable to any gay who's suffocated in the closet, to
any woman who's hidden her talents to "get a man," or to any member of
the status quo who has stayed silent in the presence of outspoken
bigotry.  It is a film that must be seen, and be seen by many.
     The film is startlingly original.  It neither sags nor looks
stagey, which is often the case for one-actor-stage-shows attempted on
film.  Maybury (who's worked with the medium of video for thirteen
years) supports Swinton's performance with brilliant composite images
(drawn from newsreels of the time, contemporary footage of Berlin, and
the most compelling image imaginable, Tilda Swinton's amazing face).
Swinton portrays over a dozen characters, male and female, and with
chameleon-like subtlety.  Whoever did hair, costume and makeup is
a genius.
     There are several soul-shattering, personal moments of revelation
that you'd normally associate only with the highest peaks of
world-class "live" theatre.  It is when the film's acting/directing is
so brilliantly intense that you are stripped of every barrier ...
granted the vision to peer into the absolute essence of Swinton's
character.  Yet this film still has the best "fluid" aspects of
cinema, and you never feel "trapped" in a filmed stage play.
     Even if the camera work and directing were inept (which is far
from the case) this film would warrant a rave review, just for the
privilege of seeing Swinton's epic performance.  There are moments,
like the one when the unmoving camera stays fixed on Swinton's slanted
face against a pillow that reach the summit of great film acting.  It
compares with Emil Jannings dropping to his knees in THE LAST LAUGH's
washroom; Jean Louis-Berrault's achingly unrequited love for Arletty in
CHILDREN OF PARADISE; and the brief scene in WHO'S AFRAID OF VIRGINIA
WOOLF when Elizabeth Taylor (viewed through a screen door) drops all
her defenses and confesses her love and dependence for "George," ....
     Director John Maybury has achieved the unthinkable by capturing
every nuance of Swinton's performance, while exercising deft skill in
either isolating her image in unforgettable black and white, or
enhancing it with a kaleidoscope of color composite shots.
     The film is uncompromising, and "takes no prisoners" in its
relentless mission to stay true to intentions of the script.  At times
it is difficult to watch, and it occasionally takes concentration for
an American audience to filter everything through Swinton's heavy
working class accent.  The director's approach is deliberately
antagonistic, both sexually and politically.  The choices made by
Swinton's character will alternately draw you closer to her, or
distance and repulse you.  The ambiguity of gender is just one of many
levels the film offers for interpretation.
HISTORY: Maybury was given 160,000 pounds and a ten day shooting
schedule by the BBC.  He had a minuscule three weeks to edit.  This
will stun you when you see the fine instincts that went into the
composite shots, and the variety of ways Swinton is framed.  Images are
often painfully original.  Swinton assumes the gaunt features of a
concentration camp victim, while an inverted camera makes her appear to
be clinging from the ceiling, bat-like.  In another image, splashed
with symbolic menstrual blood, she assumes the angular, almost
pre-natal positions common in Weimar abstract art.  The final close-up
of her heavily socketed, aging face resembles the famous "optical
trick" image of the Gibson girl in front of a large vanity mirror--from
a distance it becomes a skull.
     In the Q/A session, the director revealed that many of these
"archetypal" images were subconscious.  He drew from a vast library of
techniques and images he's used before (enabling him to create a
masterpiece, and not a "low-budget" offering in just ten days).
     The script was derived from a one woman play (starring Swinton, of
course) staged at the Edinburgh Festival in 1987.  The original English
translation from the German was "plain text."  All movement and staging
belongs to Maybury.  This film was completed in 1992, before Swinton
did ORLANDO.
     Unfortunately, the BBC transferred the 16mm original (which has
much more subtle lighting effects) to video, and televised it,
essentially killing the film's chances for distribution in the UK.
Hence the director is now in the unenviable position of seeking
funding to make a 35mm print and get distribution elsewhere.  He has a
five- minute test of how luminous the film is, when transferred to 35mm.
     My comparison to THE BLUE ANGEL is no exaggeration.  This film,
if it is distributed, is destined to achieve such enduring appeal.
 ... be sure to tell them "Max sent me." (I want my name in the credits!)

Title
Review for Tito i ja (1992)
Rating: 8 on scale of 1->10
Country of Origin: Yugoslavia/France
In Serbo-Croatian with English subtitles
Running Length:   105 minutes
DIR/SCR: Goran Markovic
PROD: Markovic, Zoran Masirevic, Michel Mavros, Zoran Tasic
CAM: Racoslav
ED: Snezana Ivanovic
CAST: Dmitrie Vojnov, Lazar Ristovski, Anica Dobra, Pedrog Manojlovic
Rating: none.  Appropriate for family viewing for kids old enough for subtitles.
IN A NUTSHELL: quirky, endearing comedy about a young boy in 1954's
Tito-ruled Yugoslavia.  Unable to cope with his extended dysfunctional
family and cramped quarters, he spends more and more time in a fantasy
world where Tito is the benign father figure.  This causes humorous
fiction in his dissident family (a little like 60's activists having a
child turn Republican.) The break-down of a party-line teacher's
control over a summer camp hike resembles the crumbling of Yugoslavia
itself.  The lead child actor occasionally gets on your nerves, as does
the repetitious soundtrack, but worth seeing.  Probably better at a
theatre than on video.
     The film is a clever combination of filmed action spliced with
high camp Tito newsreels, melded to a zany mambo soundtrack.  Young
Zoran is overweight, and an outcast with most of his family and school
mates.  He retreats further and further from reality, seeing Tito as a
romantic idol.  He stuns his school by winning the essay contest that
will have him go on a "young pioneer" camp/march and meet the Dictator
himself.  The film follows the giddy path that eventually confronts
young Zoran with his idol, clay feet and all.
     A smug, dyed in the wool Commie teacher takes out his own sense of
powerlessness on the hapless youth.  Many viewers will share my
observation that this Commie teacher is remarkably like the "my country
right or wrong" Republicans that  many baby boomers had as teachers in
grammar and high school.  (Back in the 60's I had a high school English
teacher who gave us our "party-approved" reading assignment, "The
Bloody Red Hands of Ho Chi Minh" ... from Reader's Digest! ...  Welcome
to California.)  Apparently it's a universal phenomenon for failures in
the job market, with thwarted ambitions to end up the keepers of our
children's minds.  This teacher resembles a scruffy Tom Selleck, with
all the charm of a J. Edgar Hoover.
     Amusing sidelights are cast by Zoran's "artist" parents (a
musician dad who ends up playing sax in seedy night clubs, and his
jealous/possessive ballerina mother who grates the holier than though
live-in sister-in-law.)
     A great film to brighten up the next rainy Sunday afternoon.
Check it out.  The ending may be a bit syrupy (shades of KARATE KID)
but the film is full of heart and good belly laughs.

Title
Review for Udju Azul di Yonta (1992)
Rating: 8.0 (B, ****)
Seen 5/6/93 SF Film Festival
Date Released: none, no distributor for North America
Country of Origin:  Guinea-Bissau/Portugal 1992
In Portuguese and Creole with English subtitles
Running Length:   95 min
Rating: none.  No sex/violence/language
Cast: Maysa Marta, Antonio Simao Mendes, Pedro Dias, Dina Vaz
Director: Flora Gomes
Producer: Paulo de Sousa
Screenplay: Gomes, David Lang, Ina Cesaire, Manuel Rambout Barceles
Camera: Dominique Gentil
Editor: Dominique Paris
IN A NUTSHELL: touching, quirky foreign film about a country you've
probably never heard of, populated with people you'll never forget.
Visually compelling, due to splashy native color, flawed by wooden
acting amongst the supporting cast.  At times reminiscent of the
surrealistic images/humor of a Luis Bunuel film.  Overall the film is a
refreshing, original experience.
     Yonta's eyes aren't really blue.  Perhaps the anonymous
love-letter praising her blue eyes refers to her azure eye shadow,
striking against her burnished ebony skin.  Or perhaps it is a
reference to the reflected blue from the disco lights of "El
Tropicana."  Maysa Marta is a very compelling presence in the screen
role of Yonta, the most beautiful girl in the tiny west African country
of Guinea-Bissau (a former Portuguese colony which achieved
independence in 1973.)  Yonta is the catalyst that affects several
lives in her orbit.
     Far from self-obsessed with her own hypnotic beauty, she is very
practical and level-headed.  Though living in a Third World country,
this girl knows what she wants and where she's going.  We see her
handle sidewalk wolves and customer with equal diplomacy.  She's in
love with the older, emotionally remote Vincente (Antonio Simao
Mendes), while her young secret admirer, the directionless Ze (Pedro
Dias) pines away for her.  When her tipsy girl friend reads her
anonymous love letter out loud to the disco crowd (unaware that the
painfully shy writer is in attendance), we follow a path with the film
that delves deep into areas of personal pride and hurt.
     The film has an intriguing setting, a former African colony,
twenty years after the revolution ... when reality has set in.  Power
failures occur with alarming frequency, and the camera captures the
domino effects on everyday life, e.g., no refrigeration, no fish, no
means of income for the local market women.  If nothing else, the film
will make you pause, and imagine the human price paid in so many page
one stories of famine and revolution we skim over during morning
coffee.  A strong sense of family and community buoys the film, from
the neighborhood children who sneak an evicted widows belongings back
into her house, to the bonds between girlfriends preparing for a
wedding.  Revolutionary heros cope with living in the past, while
Yonta, the fountainhead of the new generation, makes peace with the
unwelcome present.
     Although the film is a satisfying experience overall, much of the
supporting cast has a very wooden acting style by western standards.
(Who knows, it may be the normal demeanor in this remote land.) I
recommend this film, though be forewarned that as with Opera, many
allowances need to be made in view of the different cultural values,
and approach to presentation.  The film is filled with several
unforgettable images, from the dark, brooding Vincente conversing with
the carved statues of his ancestors, to the Dali-esque wedding that the
film culminates in.

Title
Review for Strictly Ballroom (1992)
RATING = 10 (scale of 0 -> 10, 10 = must see)
Australian, (general distribution in Australia August 1992.)
No nudity, little profanity, no violence.
     Why would anyone want to go to a film about the cut-throat,
competitive world of ballroom dancing, that some critics might be
tempted to label as a cross between DIRTY DANCING and FLASHDANCE?
     If PRETTY WOMAN is your favorite film, go for the costumes, the
dancing and the terrific hairstyles.  If you lean towards THE PLAYER, go
see this film for the touching parable of growing up, and overcoming
repressive unquestioned "traditional values."  But most of all, go
because the film is a gift: a thoroughly Aussie maverick that kicks up
its heels at film-making conventions, and has some great comedy and
dancing to boot.
     The film's slight plot grew from a fifty-minute Australian stage
play, that started out as a student project at NIDA (National Institute
for the Dramatic Arts).  It toured Oz to great acclaim and won awards at
an international competition in Czechoslovakia.  The Aussie producers
were unable to convince overseas distributors of financiers to help fund
the film, so they turned to their own devices for fund-raising, and made
it "their way."
     Though lacking stars of any renown in North America, STRICTLY
BALLROOM is a thoroughly engaging film chock full of Oscar-worthy
supporting performances, terrific dancing, comedy drawn in brush strokes
broad enough to make Monty Python envious.  This film may be the
international launching pad for Paul Mercurio, a highly gifted
choreographer and lead dancer with a stream of hits in Oz.  (I had the
privilege to watch him dance live from front row seats in August, where
he sucked up the audience's attention like a black hole ... what 5 other
dancers in the company?)  With a young Tyrone Power's face on Marky
Mark's body, Mercurio is a candidate for the decade's next "poster boy"
role.
     The film's only disappointment (which won't affect Americans) is
that the camera isn't "kind" enough to Mercurio, and film stock flattens
much of his dynamic energy.  It's a shame that more of his brilliant
dance career wasn't shared by a world audience.  A chance to see
Mercurior perform live on stage is well worth whatever means it takes to
get "down under" to his next venue.
     The film is an uneven mix of visual and acting styles, but taken as
a whole, the film is reminiscent of the works of Swiss artist Paul Klee,
who according to the Encyclopedia Britannica "attempted through his own
highly inventive pictorial language to convey the essential spiritual
significance of things."  That wouldn't be a bad description of director
Baz Luhrmann's style.  From the deadpan seriousness of the love story to
the giddy Peter Max colored dance sequences and flashbacks, each scene
carries much more than meets the eye.
     Synopsis: Scott Hastings (Mercurio) appears to have it all: looks,
charm, and a shoe-in for the next Pan Pacific Grand Prix Champion.  He
shocks the Ballroom Federation's dictatorial director, and his lifetime
ballroom dancing parents (who missed their chance and are counting on
Scott...) by introducing some wild new steps in the rhumba competition.
Losing his partner of 15 years, Scott's only hope is to bring ugly
duckling Fran (Tara Morice) up to speed.  Along the rocky path to the
finals Scott learns a thing or too about love and loyalty from Fran, and
about "real" dancing from Fran's flamenco dancing immigrant father.
     Tara Morice brings sensitivity and charm to what could have been a
throw-away role.  Pat Thomson gives a world-class performance as the
bleached blond comet of a stage mother who'll stop at nothing to hitch
her son Scott to his rightful partner "Tina Sparkle" (instead of the
little "nothing" with the bad complexion.)  The rest of the cast lend
some flesh and substance to cartoon-like characters.
     Though on the surface, *very* Australian in it's fixation with
Ballroom Dancing and class structure, the film has a heart-felt message
for anyone who grew up to be something other than their parents
best-laid plans.  The "rebellion" carried out in dance steps will speak
to anyone who's had to put a lid on it at work, or in any other highly
compromising environment.  In spite of this, I fear for the film's
acceptance, in that much of it's satire may be misinterpreted, and the
broader comic icons will make easy targets for myopic critics who
collapse into comparisons on any film with vaguely familiar themes.
     Though it remains to be seen how American audiences will warm to
this quirky film, it's been picked up for distribution in 86 countries,
and was voted audience favorite at both the Toronto and Cannes film
festivals.  If the film accomplishes nothing more than exposing Paul
Mercurio to a wider audience (though so far he's a better dancer than
actor) the film will proved its worth on at least one level.
     While in Sydney recently, I was also able to visit the Powerhouse
museum and see an exhibit about the creation of the film.  Though
Americans might think some of the ballroom scenes are overblown
caricatures, Polaroids of actual events reveal the film to be visually
very true to its topic.  Some of the competition scenes were filmed on
the floor of the *real* Pan Pacific Ballroom Competition, which
ironically created an eerie sense of unreality.  (Also got a close up
look at the costumes, which are dynamite.)
     Local Australian critics interpreted STRICTLY BALLROOM as a coming
of age film for Australia, in which a more diverse population is
revealed to have more to offer than the stodgy Anglo values of countless
decades.  Even if you have trouble taking the love story between Mecurio
and Morice seriously, you'll still enjoy broad references to shameless
plugs for Coca Cola, and some smug camera angles that wink satirically
at DIRTY DANCING.  Though not the Hope Diamond, the film has enough
facets and catches enough light to make the nearly two-hour length seem
to fly by all too fast.
     To be distributed by MiraMax, look for openings in major cities
sometime in February/March.
